S.  1110,  THE  ENGINE  COOLANT  AND  ANTIFREEZE 

BITTERING  AGENT  ACT  OF  2005

S.  HRG.  109–377

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, PRODUCT 

SAFETY, AND INSURANCE

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JULY  18,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

27–356 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  CONSUMER  AFFAIRS,  PRODUCT  SAFETY,  AND 

INSURANCE 

GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 18, 2005 ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen .....................................................................................
Prepared Statement of Hon. Martin J. Chave´z, Mayor, Albuquerque, New 
Mexico ............................................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Amundson, Sara, Legislative Director, Doris Day Animal League .....................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Report,  dated  July  25–26,  2001,  from  the  California  Integrated  Waste 
Management Board .......................................................................................
Bye, Jeffrey, Vice President, Prestone ...................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Elder,  Jacqueline,  Assistant  Executive  Director,  Hazard  Identification  and 
Reduction, Consumer Product Safety Commission ...........................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
McCoy, Hon. Kathy A., State Representative from New Mexico .........................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
1

9
2

13
15

20
9
11

6
7
3
5

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

S.  1110,  THE  ENGINE  COOLANT  AND 

ANTIFREEZE  BITTERING  AGENT  ACT  OF  2005

MONDAY,  JULY  18,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, PRODUCT 
SAFETY, AND INSURANCE, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  George  Allen,
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator  ALLEN.  Good  morning.  Good  morning  to  everyone.  I  call 
this  hearing  of  the  Senate  Subcommittee  on  Consumer  Affairs, 
Product Safety, and Insurance to order. 

We  are  here  to  consider  S.  1110,  a  bill  entitled  Engine  Coolant 

and Antifreeze Bittering Agent Act of 2005. 

First,  I  want  to  thank  our  Ranking  Member,  Senator  Mark 
Pryor,  from  Arkansas,  for  co-sponsoring  this  bill  with  me.  Thank 
you for your attendance and interest, and your razorback dogs that 
you brought here as a part of our well-behaved audience. 

I  also  thank  our  witnesses.  I’d  like  to  talk  to  you  all  more  after-
wards. We had the K–9 in there, and everyone was in such a hub-
bub, it was hard to get through to you all. But I want to thank our 
witnesses,  who  come  from  all  over  the  country  to  share  with  this 
Committee their views on this legislation. 

And  I  also  do  want  to  thank  the  many  citizens  who  have  shown 

interest in this legislation. And I thank you all for attending. 

They call this the ‘‘dog days of summer,’’ and I guess they really 
are  literally  here  in  this  room.  And  we  all  want  dogs  and  animals 
and  children  to  have  many  happy  summers,  and  that’s  part  of  the 
reason  for  this  bill,  which  is  intended  to  make  antifreeze  a  less-
dangerous  product  throughout  the  United  States,  with  national 
standards. 

When children and animals ingest antifreeze, there is the poten-
tial that they can be seriously harmed, or, killed. Many poisonings 
in  dogs  and  cats  have  already  been  reported  over  the  years.  This 
bill envisions a reasonable solution to avoiding these types of trage-
dies.  By  adding  a  bittering  agent  to  antifreeze,  we  hope  that  anti-
freeze  becomes  unpalatable  to  animals  and  to  children,  and  deters 
them from any further ingestion. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

This legislation is to reduce risk, and it’s also important for com-
merce  and  jobs.  Radiator  fluid  manufacturers  should  be  given  an 
opportunity  to  comment  on  this  legislation,  because  it’s  obviously 
going to affect their operations and people who work for their com-
panies.  We  need  to  keep  America’s  businesses  more  competitive. 
And, also, we want to make sure that prices are reasonable for cus-
tomers. 

I  believe  this  bill  takes  into  consideration  all  parties  for  reason-
able  government  action  that  appears  to  have  a  consensus  of  sup-
port, from people who are animal owners or animal lovers, to man-
ufacturers, to customers who would also support this idea. 

I look forward to hearing from our witnesses today, to hear their 

perspectives regarding the desirability of this legislation. 

And, with that, Senator Pryor, if you’d like to make any opening 
comments before I proceed to introducing our witnesses and listen-
ing to testimony, we’d love to hear from you. 

Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I just want to say I’m so delighted to work with you on this legis-
lation,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  help  shepherd 
this  through  the  Senate  and  through  the  Congress  and  onto  the 
President’s desk. 

This  is  legislation  that’s  really  a  win-win  situation.  I  know  the 
industry, as well as various consumer groups and animal advocacy 
groups,  et  cetera—children’s  groups—have  come  together  to  try  to 
find  a  solution  that’s  agreeable  to  all.  We  all  know  the  nature  of 
the  problem,  and  that  is  to  children  and  animals,  antifreeze  can 
taste good. In fact, I think some people say it tastes a little bit like 
soda-pop.  And  so,  as  we  all  know,  what  happens  is,  maybe  in  the 
garage,  a  container  is  not  tightly  sealed,  or  there’s  a  spill  in  the 
driveway  or  out  on  the  road,  or  some  carelessly  discarded  anti-
freeze, but, nonetheless, an animal or a child will have some expo-
sure to it, which can have fatal consequences. 

So,  I  just  think  that  the  fact  that  adding  this  chemical  to  anti-
freeze,  for  pennies  a  gallon,  is  a  common-sense  solution,  it’s  one 
that  we  already  know  will  work.  This  chemical  we’re  going  to  talk 
about  today,  I  think,  is  the  most  bitter  chemical  in  the  world,  or 
one of the most. And so, it’s already in a number of other products, 
and it’s already proven to be very effective. 

And  so,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  your  leadership  on  this  in 

helping steward this bill through the Congress. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Senator Pryor. And I thank you. This 
needs to be a bipartisan effort, and I thank you for your leadership. 
And we’re going to work together as a team. 

And before we listen to the testimony of our witnesses, let me in-
troduce  each  of  you  briefly  so  that  our  audience  here  in  the  room 
know who you are. 

First,  I  want  to  introduce  a  Representative  from  the  State  of 
New  Mexico,  Kathy  McCoy,  a  state  legislator,  who  flew  in  last 
night to join us. Representative McCoy was instrumental in enact-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

ing similar legislation in the State of New Mexico. She also has her 
own unfortunate personal story to relate. 

Representative  McCoy,  thank  you.  Thank  you  for  coming.  We 
look forward to hearing your expert testimony, as legislators at the 
Federal level, to learn from what you all have done with your lead-
ership in New Mexico. 

Next,  we’ll  hear  from  Jacqueline  Elder,  Assistant  Executive  Di-
rector  for  Hazard  Identification  and  Reduction  at  the  Consumer 
Product  Safety  Commission.  She  was  present  at  the  CPSC  when  a 
study  was  commissioned  to  study  the  effectiveness  of  bittering 
agents  in  consumer  products.  Her  professional  expertise  is  appre-
ciated. 

Thank you, Ms. Elder, for being here this morning. 
We’ll  then  hear  from  Jeff  Bye,  who’s  Vice  President  of  Prestone, 
which  is  a  subsidiary  of  Honeywell.  Jeff’s  company  is  the  largest 
manufacturer of antifreeze in the world. 

Your testimony, Mr. Bye, will be important, because this legisla-
tion  will  partially  and  significantly  fall  upon  your  shoulders  and 
that of your company. Thank you for being with us. 

Finally,  we’ll  hear  from  Sara  Amundson,  Deputy  Director  of  the 
Doris  Day  Animal  League.  Sara’s  organization  is  a  strong,  re-
spected  advocate  for  protecting  animals  from  preventable  harm, 
which is, we all agree, a very worthy goal, a goal that is furthered, 
we believe, by this legislation. 

We  look  forward  to  hearing  your  understanding  of  the  way  that 
bittering legislation has developed in the goal of making antifreeze 
a safer product throughout the United States. 

Thank  you  all  for  being  here.  We’d  first  like  to  hear  from  Rep-

resentative McCoy. 

Ms. McCoy? 

STATEMENT OF HON. KATHY A. MCCOY,

STATE REPRESENTATIVE FROM NEW MEXICO 

Ms. MCCOY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Senator. 
I appreciate the opportunity to appear before you today to testify 
on  a  topic  that  will  resonate  with  anyone  who  holds  their  family 
pets  dear  to  them.  And  I  also  appreciate  you  considering  this  im-
portant legislation in such a thoughtful manner. 

For many of us, losing a beloved family pet is like losing a mem-
ber of the family. I’m here today because I lost Cujo, my golden re-
triever, who is pictured here, to a painful and prolonged death due 
to  antifreeze  poisoning.  You  have  a  chance  today  to  spare  other 
families by approving this legislation before you. 

As  a  member  of  the  New  Mexico  House  of  Representatives,  I 
sponsored 
legislation  that  requires  that  a  bittering  agent, 
denatonium benzoate, be added to antifreeze. My own experience is 
what  motivated  me  being  here  today.  It’s  been  over  20  years  since 
I  lost  Cujo,  but  I’ve  not  forgotten  the  devastating  experience.  The 
costs are extremely high, not only financially, but emotionally. And 
anyone  who  believes  that  the  cost  to  families  is  low  on  a  tragedy 
like  this  would  be  wrong.  Even  that  long  ago,  my  veterinarian  bill 
was in the hundreds of dollars, and it was money I could ill afford 
at the time. My dog was aggressively treated for over a week, while 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

I  lost  several  days  of  work  keeping  vigil  by  his  side.  And  the  at-
tempt to save him did fail. 

Today,  the  cost  of  treating  antifreeze  poisoning  begins  at  $500, 
and can go well over a thousand dollars. And, even with treatment, 
more  often  than  not  the  pet  will  not  survive  the  lethal  toxins  in 
antifreeze,  which  is  deadly  to  kidney  tissue.  Some  of  the  external 
symptoms  that  I  saw  were  seizures,  hypothermia,  head  tremors, 
vomiting,  and  coma.  Ultimately,  kidney  failure  results  in  death. 
Animals  that  do  survive  after—often  have  permanent  kidney  and 
brain  damage.  Unfortunately,  families  who  do  not  have  the  re-
sources to pay for treatment are forced to euthanize their pet. 

Compare the cost to the pennies that it is estimated to cost man-

ufacturers to add the denatonium benzoate to——

Senator  ALLEN.  Let’s  do  this.  From  henceforth—let’s  call 

that. 

denatonium benzoate—

Ms. MCCOY. DB. 
Senator ALLEN. DB. Can we? 
Ms. MCCOY. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator ALLEN. Are you agreed? All right. 
Ms. MCCOY. That’s fine with me. I always get tongue-twisted on 

We’d obviously prefer not to burden the manufacturers at all, but 
the  high  cost  of  adding  this  bittering  agent  can  only  be  measured 
by a family’s pain. 

Sadly,  most  of  the  poisonings  are  accidental.  One  of  the  most 
common  ways  for  a  dog  to  come  in  contact  is  if  a  family  car  leaks. 
Its  sweet  flavor  is  irresistible  to  most  animals,  and  it  is  lethal  in 
as  little  as  a  quarter  of  an  ounce.  For  example,  if  a  cat  just  walks 
through a puddle of it and then licks its paws, unless it has imme-
diate veterinary care, that cat will likely die. 

And since it tastes good to animals, it is also a method commonly 
used  by  some  to  deliberately  and  cruelly  poison  animals.  Because 
pet  owners  typically  don’t  report  pet  deaths  due  to  antifreeze  poi-
soning,  I  can’t  accurately  cite  any  numbers  of  animal  deaths,  but 
I  worked  with  our  local  shelter  for  8  years,  and  I  know—there’s 
enough  anecdotal  evidence  to  know  that  this  is  a  common  occur-
rence. 

I  introduced  this  legislation  in  New  Mexico,  not  only  because  of 
my  personal  experience,  but  also  because  of  another  dog,  named 
Scooby.  Scooby  was  also  a  golden  retriever,  and  he  made  news  in 
New Mexico when he was shot in the face. He managed to survive 
that  ordeal,  only  to  be  poisoned  while  he  was  recovering.  Had  he 
not  been  drawn  to  the  antifreeze,  he’d  still  be  alive,  and  the  little 
girl who owned Scooby would be a happier child. 

Too  often,  we  discount  animal  suffering,  and  rationalize  that 
‘‘they’re  just  animals.’’  But  they  do  feel  pain,  and  they  do  deserve 
to  be  treated  humanely.  And  their  families  deserve  to  enjoy  their 
company for as long as possible. 

This  legislation  before  you  is  a  step  in  eliminating  one  form  of 
suffering.  It’s  been  said  that  the  way  we  treat  our  animals  is  a 
measure of our society. Today, we have an opportunity to raise the 
bar of compassion a little bit higher. 

In  my  opinion,  this  is  win-win  legislation.  After  getting  this 
passed  in  the  New  Mexico  House,  I  received  an  incredible  amount 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

of  positive  feedback.  I  got  phone  calls,  letters  from  schools,  letters 
from other people, and people still stop me on the street and thank 
me.  It  has  no  downside.  It  makes  economical  sense,  and  it’s  also 
the right thing to do. 

So,  I  hope  you  will  move  this  legislation  forward,  for  those  of  us 
who have been exposed to the lethal effects of antifreeze poisoning 
and for those who may be exposed in the future. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Senator,  that  concludes  my  testimony,  and  I 

would be happy to answer any questions. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Representative McCoy, for your testi-
mony  and  your  experience.  We’ll  hear  from  all  the  witnesses,  and 
then we’ll pose questions afterwards. 

[The prepared statement of Representative McCoy follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KATHY A. MCCOY,

STATE REPRESENTATIVE FROM NEW MEXICO 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  and  testify  on  a  topic  that 
will resonate with anyone who holds dear their family pets. And thank you for also 
considering this important legislation in a thoughtful manner. 

For  many  of  us,  losing  a  beloved  pet  is  like  losing  a  member  of  the  family.  I’m 
here  today  because  I  lost  my  Golden  Retriever,  Cujo,  to  a  painful  and  prolonged 
death due to antifreeze poisoning. 

You  have  a  chance  to  spare  other  families  that  tragedy  by  approving  the  legisla-

tion before you. 

As a Member of the New Mexico House of Representatives, I sponsored legislation 
that requires that a bittering agent—denatonium benzoate—be added to antifreeze. 
(While  the  bill  I  sponsored  passed  both  chambers,  it  was  actually  an  identical  Sen-
ate  bill  that  was  signed  into  law  by  the  governor.)  The  experience  I  had  with  my 
own dog was the motivating force. 

It’s  been  over  20  years  since  I  lost  Cujo,  but  I’ve  not  forgotten  the  devastating 
experience. The costs are extremely high, both emotional and financial. Anyone who 
believes  there  is  little  cost  to  families  who  experience  this  tragedy  is  flat  wrong. 
Even  that  long  ago,  my  vet  bill  was  hundreds  of  dollars,  money  I  could  ill  afford 
at  the  time.  My  dog  was  aggressively  treated  for  over  a  week  while  I  lost  several 
days of work keeping a vigil at his side. The attempt to save him failed. 

Today,  the  cost  of  treating  a  poisoning  such  as  this  starts  at  $500.  Even  with 
treatment, more often than not, the pet will not survive the effects of the lethal tox-
ins in antifreeze. Some external symptoms are seizures, hypothermia, head tremors, 
and  vomiting.  Ultimately,  kidney  failure  results  in  death.  Animals  that  do  survive 
may suffer permanent kidney and brain damage. 

And  unfortunately,  families  who  don’t  have  the  financial  resources  have  no  real 

choice other than euthanasia for their pet. 

Compare  the  cost  to  the  pennies  it  is  estimated  to  cost  manufacturers  to  add 
denatonium  benzoate  to  a  $7  gallon  of  antifreeze.  We’d  prefer  not  to  burden  the 
manufacturers  at  all,  but  the  high  cost  of  not  adding  this  bittering  agent  can  only 
be measured by a family’s pain. 

Sadly, most of these poisonings are accidental—one of the most common ways for 
animals  to  come  in  contact  with  antifreeze  is  from  a  family  car  that’s  leaking  it. 
Antifreeze’s  sweet  flavor  is  irresistible  to  most  animals,  and  it  is  lethal  in  as  little 
as a quarter of an ounce. For example, a cat that walks through a puddle and then 
licks its paws will likely die without immediate veterinary care. 

And,  since  antifreeze  tastes  good  to  animals,  it  is  also  a  method  used  by  some  to 

deliberately and cruelly poison animals. 

Because  pet  owners  don’t  typically  report  pet  deaths  due  to  antifreeze  poisoning, 
I can’t accurately cite the quantity of animals deaths, but having volunteered at our 
local  shelter  for  eight  years,  I’ve  heard  enough  anecdotal  evidence  to  know  that  it 
is a common occurrence. 

I introduced this legislation in New Mexico not only because of my personal expe-
rience, but also because of another dog named Scooby. Scooby, who was also a Gold-
en Retriever, made news in New Mexico when he was shot in the face. He managed 
to survive that ordeal, only to be poisoned while he was recovering. Had he not been 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

drawn  to  the  antifreeze,  he’d  still  be  alive  and  the  little  girl  who  owned  Scooby 
would be a happier child. 

Too  often,  we  discount  animal  suffering  and  rationalize  that  ‘‘they’re  just  ani-
mals.’’  But  they  do  feel  pain.  They  do  deserve  to  be  treated  humanely.  And  their 
families  deserve  to  enjoy  their  company  for  as  long  as  possible.  This  legislation  be-
fore you is a step toward eliminating one form of suffering. 

It’s been said that the way we treat our animals is a measure of our society; today 

we have an opportunity to raise the bar of compassion a little higher. 

In my opinion, this is win-win legislation. After getting this passed in the House, 
I  received  an  incredible  amount  of  positive  feedback—phone  calls,  letters,  and  peo-
ple even now stop me on the street to thank me. This legislation has no downside—
it  not  only  makes  economical  sense,  but  it  is  also  the  right  thing  to  do.  I  hope  you 
will move this legislation forward for those of us who have already experienced the 
lethal  effects  of  antifreeze  poisoning  and  for  those  who  may  be  exposed  in  the  fu-
ture.

Senator ALLEN. Now we would like to hear from Ms. Elder. 

STATEMENT  OF  JACQUELINE  ELDER,  ASSISTANT  EXECUTIVE 
DIRECTOR,  HAZARD  IDENTIFICATION  AND  REDUCTION, 
CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 
Ms.  ELDER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  good  morning.  I’m 
pleased to have this opportunity to come before your Subcommittee 
today. 

I  am  the  Assistant  Executive  Director  for  Hazard  Identification 
and  Reduction  at  the  U.S.  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission, 
or  CPSC.  The  CPSC  is  a  bipartisan  independent  agency  charged 
with protecting the public from unreasonable risks of serious injury 
or  death  from  more  than  15,000  types  of  consumer  products  under 
the  agency’s  jurisdiction.  The  CPSC  has  delivered  critical  safety 
benefits to America’s families and has made a significant contribu-
tion to the 30 percent decline in the rate of deaths and injuries re-
lated to hazardous consumer products. We are proud of our mission 
and  our  achievements,  and  we  appreciate  the  support  that  Con-
gress  has  extended  to  the  agency  and  to  its  goals  over  the  years. 
In my role at the CPSC, I oversee the technical work of the agen-
cy  within  the  directorates  for  epidemiology,  engineering  sciences, 
economic  analysis,  health  sciences,  and  laboratory  sciences.  My  of-
fice  is  responsible  for  the  collection  and  analysis  of  death  and  in-
jury  data  related  to  consumer  products  that  can  lead  to  the  devel-
opment of voluntary and mandatory product-safety standards. 

Today’s hearing is on S. 1110, the Engine Coolant and Antifreeze 
Bittering  Act  of  2005.  This  legislation  amends  the  Federal  Haz-
ardous  Substances  Act,  which  is  administered  by  the  CPSC.  The 
legislation  would  require  engine  coolant  and  antifreeze  to  contain 
a bittering agent to render those products unpalatable. 

On that subject, the CPSC was directed by Congress, in the Con-
sumer Product Safety Improvement Act of 1990, to conduct a study 
of  aversive  agents.  CPSC  completed  that  study  and  issued  a  final 
report on aversive agents in 1992. I will direct my comments today 
specifically to the findings of that 1992 report. 

The  CPSC  defined  the  term  ‘‘aversive,’’  for  the  purpose  of  that 
study,  as  a  substance  added  to  a  product  with  the  intent  of  deter-
ring  or  limiting  its  ingestion.  In  1991,  the  agency  conducted  a  lit-
erature  review  and  requested  information  on  aversive  agents,  in-
cluding bittering and pungent agents, from the public in a Federal 
Register notice. At that time, the response to the request for infor-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

mation and the results of the review showed that there was a gen-
eral  lack  of  information  available  on  aversive  agents,  other  than 
one  bittering  agent,  DB.  The  study  found  that  the  possible  acute 
toxicity  of  DB  does  not  appear  to  be  a  significant  issue  at  the  low 
levels  used  for  aversion,  such  as  the  30-to-50  parts-per-million 
range  identified  in  the  legislation.  DB  has  been  present  in  many 
household  products  for  years.  It  has  been  required  to  be  added  to 
ethylene glycol-containing antifreeze by several states without doc-
umented problems. 

Data  concerning  the  effectiveness  of  DB  to  decrease  the  amount 
of  a  substance  ingested  was,  and  continues  to  be,  limited.  A  child 
will  likely  drink  some  of  the  product  in  question  before  he  or  she 
can detect the bitter taste. For this reason, aversive agents are not 
recommended  for  use  with  highly  toxic  substances  that  can  seri-
ously  injure  or  kill  after  one  or  two  swallows.  However,  the  study 
noted  that  nondrug  products  that  required  child-resistant  pack-
aging  and  have  moderate  toxicity  may  benefit  from  the  addition  of 
an  aversive.  Products  that  will  not  kill  or  severely  injure  in  the 
one-to-three  mouthful  range,  but  are  associated  with  toxicity  at 
higher levels, were cited as the most appropriate products for aver-
sion addition. 

In  this  regard,  the  American  Association  of  Poison  Control  Cen-
ters,  the  AAPCC,  evaluated  3.8  million  pediatric  poisoning  inci-
dents,  and  subsequently  recommended  that  aversives  be  added  to 
a few selected products, including ethylene glycol, which is referred 
to  in  the  legislation.  The  1992  study  concluded  that  aversives,  in-
cluding DB, may be an additional protective measure if found to be 
effective. 

CPSC  continues  to  underscore  the  importance  of  child-resistant 
packaging  and  consumer  awareness  of  the  proper  handling  and 
storage  of  hazardous  and  toxic  substances  in  the  home.  The  1992 
report concludes that aversives alone are not a substitute for these 
measures. However, aversives can be part of a comprehensive safe-
ty protocol that includes these other important components. 

Each  year,  accidental  ingestion  of  toxic  household  substances  is 
associated with almost 30 deaths to children under age five. There 
are  about  one  million  calls  to  Poison  Control  Centers  annually  in-
volving  children  under  5  years  of  age.  The  CPSC  will  continue  to 
work aggressively to reduce these deaths and injuries. 

We  are  pleased  that  the  Committee  is  calling  attention  to  these 
dangerous hazards, and I am pleased to answer any questions that 
the Senators may have regarding this important subject. 

Thanks. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Elder follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JACQUELINE ELDER, ASSISTANT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

HAZARD IDENTIFICATION AND REDUCTION, CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  good  morning.  I  am  pleased  to  have  this  oppor-
tunity to come before your Subcommittee today. I am the Assistant Executive Direc-
tor  for  Hazard  Identification  and  Reduction  at  the  U.S.  Consumer  Product  Safety 
Commission  or  CPSC.  The  CPSC  is  a  bipartisan,  independent  agency  charged  with 
protecting  the  public  from  unreasonable  risks  of  serious  injury  or  death  from  more 
than 15,000 types of consumer products under the agency’s jurisdiction. 

The  CPSC  has  delivered  critical  safety  benefits  to  America’s  families  and  has 
made  a  significant  contribution  to  the  30  percent  decline  in  the  rate  of  deaths  and 
injuries  related  to  hazardous  consumer  products.  We  are  proud  of  our  mission  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

our achievements, and we appreciate the support that Congress has extended to the 
agency and to its goals over the years. 

In  my  role  at  the  CPSC,  I  oversee  the  technical  work  of  the  agency  within  the 
directorates  for  Epidemiology,  Engineering  Sciences,  Economic  Analysis,  Health 
Sciences  and  Laboratory  Sciences.  My  office  is  responsible  for  the  collection  and 
analysis of death and injury data related to consumer products that can lead to the 
development of voluntary and mandatory product safety standards. 

Today’s  hearing  is  on  S.  1110,  the  Engine  Coolant  and  Antifreeze  Bittering  Act 
of 2005. This legislation amends the Federal Hazardous Substances Act which is ad-
ministered by the CPSC. The legislation would require engine coolant and antifreeze 
to contain a bittering agent to render those products unpalatable. 

On  that  subject,  the  CPSC  was  directed  by  Congress  in  the  Consumer  Product 
Safety  Improvement  Act  of  1990  to  conduct  a  study  of  aversive  agents.  CPSC  com-
pleted  that  study  and  issued  a  final  report  on  aversive  agents  in  1992,  and  I  will 
direct my comments today specifically to the findings of that 1992 report. 

The CPSC defined the term aversive for the purpose of that study as a substance 
added  to  a  product  with  the  intent  of  deterring  or  limiting  its  ingestion.  In  1991, 
the  agency  conducted  a  literature  review  and  requested  information  on  aversive 
agents,  including  bittering  and  pungent  agents,  from  the  public  in  a  Federal  Reg-
ister  notice.  At  that  time,  the  response  to  the  request  for  information  and  the  re-
sults  of  the  review  showed  that  there  was  a  general  lack  of  information  available 
on aversive agents other than one bittering agent, denatonium benzoate or DB. 

The study found that possible acute toxicity of DB does not appear to be a signifi-
cant issue at the low levels used for aversion, such as the 30 to 50 parts per million 
range identified in the legislation. DB has been present in many household products 
for  years.  It  has  been  required  to  be  added  to  ethylene  glycol-containing  antifreeze 
by several states without documented problems. 

Data  concerning  the  effectiveness  of  DB  to  decrease  the  amount  of  a  substance 
ingested was and continues to be limited. A child will likely drink some of the prod-
uct in question before he or she can detect the bitter taste. For this reason aversive 
agents are not recommended for use with highly toxic substances that can seriously 
injure or kill after one or two swallows. 

However,  the  study  noted  that  non-drug  products  that  require  child-resistant 
packaging and have moderate toxicity may benefit from the addition of an aversive. 
Products  that  will  not  kill  or  severely  injure  in  the  one  to  three  mouthful  range, 
but are associated with toxicity at higher levels, were cited as the most appropriate 
products for aversion addition. 

In  this  regard  the  American  Association  of  Poison  Control  Centers,  the  AAPCC, 
evaluated  3.8  million  pediatric  poisoning  incidents  and  subsequently  recommended 
that aversives be added to a few selected products, including ethylene glycol, which 
is referenced in the legislation. 

The 1992 study concluded that aversives, including DB, may be an additional pro-
tective  measure  if  found  to  be  effective.  CPSC  continues  to  underscore  the  impor-
tance  of  child-resistant  packaging  and  consumer  awareness  of  the  proper  handling 
and  storage  of  hazardous  and  toxic  substances  in  the  home.  The  1992  report  con-
cludes  that  aversives  alone  are  not  a  substitute  for  these  measures.  However, 
aversives can be a part of a comprehensive safety protocol that includes these other 
important components. 

Each  year,  accidental  ingestion  of  toxic  household  substances  is  associated  with 
almost  thirty  deaths  to  children  under  age  five.  There  are  about  one  million  calls 
to Poison Control Centers annually involving children under five years of age. 

The CPSC will continue to work aggressively to reduce these deaths and injuries. 
We are pleased that the Committee is calling attention to these dangerous hazards, 
and  I  am  pleased  to  answer  any  questions  that  the  Senators  may  have  regarding 
this important subject. Thank you.

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Elder,  for  your  comments  and 

your testimony. 

I’m  going  to  offer  into  the  record  this  1992  study  that  you  ref-

erenced in your testimony. * 

Senator  ALLEN.  I  would  also  say,  to  Representative  McCoy,  I’m 
going  to  also  enter  into  the  record  a  statement  of  support  from  a 
mayor  in  your  fair  state,  your  Land  of  Enchantment,  Mayor  Cha-

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

vez,  who’s  the  Mayor  of  Albuquerque.  And  that’ll  be  made  a  part 
of the record, as well. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Chave´s follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARTIN J. CHAVE´ Z, MAYOR, ALBUQUERQUE,

NEW MEXICO 

Mr.  Chairman,  Honorable  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  this  op-
portunity  to  testify  on  behalf  of  S.  1110  and  the  question  of  a  bittering  agent  for 
automobile coolant. 

The  key  ingredient  in  most  cars’  antifreeze  or  coolant,  ethylene  glycol,  is  decep-
tively sweet. So there will invariably be occasions when puddles or containers of this 
deadly poison are left out and accessible. Very small quantities are toxic, and some-
times lethal. 

So it should come as no surprise that the American Association of Poison Control 
Centers  reports  thousands  of  human  ethylene  glycol  poisonings  per  year,  some  of 
them fatal. According to their Annual Report for 2001, there were 4,938 human ex-
posures  to  ethylene  glycol,  with  713  of  them  occurring  in  children  under  the  age  of 
6. 

The  Washington  State  University  Veterinary  Medical  School  estimates  that 
10,000  dogs  alone  are  poisoned  each  year.  In  New  Mexico,  the  deaths  of  3  children 
in recent years are also attributed to this poison. 

Following  the  fatal  poisoning  of  a  local  dog  a  couple  years  ago,  we  introduced 
‘‘Scooby’s Law’’ in Albuquerque to require that all ethylene glycol based coolant sold 
within  the  municipality  include  the  bittering  agent  denatonium  benzoate—also 
known as an ‘‘aversive’’ agent—to make the poison unpalatable. 

Many  tragedies,  both  locally  and  nationwide,  could  be  prevented  by  a  few  drops 

of this bittering agent. 

Denatonium  benzoate  has  no  ill  effects  on  engine  performance  or  cooling  system 
life, but it can help prevent the next tragedy for a child, a pet or for nearby wildlife. 
It is the bitterest substance known. 

After gaining feedback from the relevant business community, we passed the leg-
islation  with  a  phase-in  timeline  for  vendors  to  comply  with  the  new  requirement. 
This  allowed  gas  stations  and  auto  parts  stores  to  transition  their  shelves  from  ex-
isting  inventory  and  to  begin  stocking  the  modified  coolant  without  serious  disrup-
tion or financial hardship. 

The  actual  cost  for  addition  of  the  bittering  agent  is  estimated  at  about  two  or 
three cents per gallon. In the eyes of our community, it is a cost well worth bearing 
for the safety of our children, wildlife and pets. The feedback has been surprisingly 
good, and I believe even the directly involved business community has seen the vir-
tue of the initiative. 

‘‘Scooby,’’ the Golden Retriever who gained statewide fame by surviving a gunshot 
wound  in  the  face,  only  to  later  die  an  excruciating  death  by  antifreeze  poisoning, 
highlighted the need for this common sense ounce of prevention. 

California and Oregon have already passed statewide laws requiring the addition 
of  bittering  agents.  And  likewise  we  have  done  so  in  Albuquerque,  as  have  some  of 
our  neighboring  jurisdictions.  But  it  would  make  much  more  sense  to  have  a  na-
tional  standard,  and  that  is  why  I  am  respectfully  requesting  that  you  consider 
making what we in Albuquerque call ‘‘Scooby’s Law’’ the law of the land. 

Thank you again for this opportunity to bring this important issue before you and 

thank you for your consideration.

Senator ALLEN. Mr. Bye, we’d now like to hear from you. 
STATEMENT OF JEFFREY BYE, VICE PRESIDENT, PRESTONE 
Mr. BYE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Senator Pryor. 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  talk  to  you  about  why,  from  the 
industry  side,  we  support  Federal  legislation  that  is  both  effective 
and  efficient  in  getting  us  all  where  we  want  to  be  on  this  issue. 
I’d  like  to  give  you  a  little  bit  of  background  as  to  where  we  come 
from, as an industry. 

I  work  for  Prestone  Products,  which  is  part  of  Honeywell  Inter-
national.  As  you  well  know,  that’s  a  large  multinational  corpora-
tion,  over  100,000  employees  worldwide,  over  50,000  employees 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

here  in  the  United  States.  We  are  in  the  transportation  products 
group.  We  also  manufacture  and  sell  Fram  filters,  and  Autolite 
spark plugs. 

Prestone,  as  a  brand—as  a  product,  is  the  largest-selling  brand 
of  antifreeze  in  the  United  States.  We  produce  both  branded  prod-
uct  and  store-branded  product  for  our  major  retail  partners.  We 
produce  that  product  in  three  states—New  Jersey,  Illinois,  and 
California—as well as in Mexico City, Mexico. And we distribute it 
through  major  retailers,  mass  merchants  like  Wal-Mart,  Target, 
Kmart,  automotive  retailers  like  Advance  Auto  Parts,  Autozone, 
Pep Boys, in all 50 states, as well as Canada and Mexico. 

Antifreeze  itself  has  been  around  since  the  late  1920s.  Prestone 
started  producing  the  product  in  1927.  Back  then,  it  was  purely 
ethylene  glycol.  It  replaced  water  as  a  coolant/freeze  protector  be-
cause  it  has  tremendous  properties  in  heat  dissipation  and  freeze 
protection. Over the years since then, Prestone has taken a leader-
ship  role,  from  an  R&D  standpoint,  in  putting  additives  into  that 
ethylene glycol, but still maintaining ethylene glycol as the primary 
component  of  antifreeze.  Those  additives  that  we  put  in  provide 
corrosion  protection  for  cooling  systems  and  improve  the  heat-and-
freeze protection characteristics of the product. 

To  that  end,  although  ethylene  glycol  is  a  tremendous  chemical 
for  use  in  a  car’s  cooling  system,  it  does  have  the  downside  that 
we’re  all  well  aware  of,  in  that  it  is  toxic  to  both  people  and  pets. 
Prestone  has  always  taken  the  position  of  doing  whatever  we  can 
to provide added measures of safety. I mean, we put childproof caps 
on  products.  We  put  a  secondary  level  of  sealant  on  the  product, 
with  a  foil  wrap.  On  the  animal  front,  we  fund  veterinary  poison 
hotlines. We fund research libraries in the veterinarian community 
for data to get out to the community. 

But,  in  spite  of  all  of  that,  over  the  past  X  period  of  time  there 
has been a movement afoot to add this bittering agent to the prod-
uct,  because,  as  Senator  Pryor  points  out,  although  I  can’t  speak 
from experience, it is a very sweet-tasting product, ethylene glycol, 
in  its  natural  state.  Back  in  1992,  a  state  bill,  the  first  state  bill, 
was  passed  in  Oregon  to  require  manufacturers  to  add  bittering 
agent  to  deter  animals  from  accidentally  coming  across  or  con-
suming  the  product.  That  was  followed  with  another  state  bill,  in 
California in 2002, requiring manufacturers to add the component. 
Most  recently,  New  Mexico,  as  we  have  heard,  passed  legislation 
last year. 

Our position, up until recently, had been to oppose those bills on 
a  state  level.  And  the  reason  was  really  twofold.  Picture,  if  you 
will,  that  we  distribute  through  all  of  those  retailers  I  described, 
to 50 states. We ship product to Wal-Mart, who has 37 distribution 
centers,  that  then  distributes  out  to  over  3,000  stores.  We  have  no 
way  of  tightly  controlling  that  on  a  state-by-state  basis.  And  our 
concern  was,  as  individual  states,  and  even  municipalities,  started 
passing  legislation  that  were  not  all  similar,  that  we  could  end  up 
with,  down  the  road,  state-by-state  requirements  on  our  product 
that were different from other states. And that becomes very, very 
unworkable, and a logistical nightmare, not only for us, but for our 
retail  partners.  And,  ultimately,  it  becomes  very  expensive  to  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

end consumer, as they would end up paying a lot of those retailers’ 
bills to redistribute that product on a state-by-state basis. 

The  other  issue  we  had  is  the  bittering  agent  itself.  We  are  ex-
perts  in  automotive  cooling  systems,  we  are  experts  in  the  chemi-
cals  we  put  in  to  address  the  needs  of  those  cooling  systems  that 
the  car  manufacturers  produce.  We  are  not  experts  in  bitterants, 
we  are  not  experts  in  the  toxicity  of  bitterants,  we  are  not  experts 
in  the  efficacy  of  bitterants,  and  we  are  not  experts  in  the  long-
term effects of those bitterants. So, we also opposed it on those lev-
els. We just are not experts in that area. We don’t know the impact 
of it. 

In spite of all of that, these bills continue to gain support. There 
are now eight more states that are looking at legislation, all slight-
ly  different  from  one  another.  And,  last  year,  the  Conference  of 
Mayors supported legislation, or supported a movement to pass leg-
islation, on a municipal level. 

It’s  our  position  now—and  late  last  year,  we  partnered  with  the 
Doris  Day  group—to  support  this  legislation,  because  we  cannot 
handle state-by-state differences. Whereas, if we could get an over-
arching  Federal  bill  that  would  allow  a  uniform  direction  to  us,  as 
manufacturers, for what we need to do, and let us assume liability 
and  get  assigned  liability  for  our  products  that  we  are  experts  at, 
and  let  the  manufacturers  and  the  providers  of  DB  have  assigned 
liability  for  whatever  their  products  may  do,  or  not  do,  it’s  a  win 
for all of us. The people that are concerned about animals and their 
protection  win;  and  we  win,  as  manufacturers,  because  we  have 
uniform direction on what to do; the retailers win, because they get 
a  unified  product;  and  the  end-consumer  wins,  because  their  ani-
mals  will  get  better  protection,  and  they  will  not  have  to  pay  any 
additional  cost  for  a  resulting  myriad  of  products  that  could  result 
without this legislation. 

So, that’s our position. Again, like everyone else, we look forward 

to answering questions at the end. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Bye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JEFFREY BYE, VICE PRESIDENT, PRESTONE 

Good Morning. I am Jeff Bye, Vice President for Prestone, a Honeywell business. 
Prestone  has  been  a  leader  in  the  manufacture,  marketing  and  sale  of  antifreeze 
products for over 75 years. I am here representing Honeywell as well as the domes-
tic  antifreeze  industry,  which  has  been  organized  by  the  Consumer  Specialty  Prod-
ucts  Association.  We  appear  before  the  Committee  in  support  of  Senate  bill  1110. 
Honeywell  is  a  diversified  technology  and  manufacturing  leader,  serving  cus-
tomers  with  aerospace  products  and  services;  control,  sensing  and  security  tech-
nologies;  automotive  products;  specialty  chemicals;  fibers;  and  electronic  materials. 
Based  in  Morris  Township,  New  Jersey,  Honeywell’s  shares  are  traded  on  the  New 
York  Stock  Exchange  as  well  as  on  the  London,  Chicago  and  Pacific  Stock  Ex-
changes. We are one of the 30 stocks that make up the Dow Jones Industrial Aver-
age and we are also a component of the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index. The company 
employs  over  100,000  employees,  with  approximately  55,000  in  the  United  States, 
and  is  comprised  of  four  business  units:  Aerospace,  Automation  and  Control  Sys-
tems; Specialty Materials, and Transportation Systems. Prestone is part of the Con-
sumer Products Group within the Transportation Systems business unit. 

Honeywell  is  the  largest  manufacturer  and  supplier  of  automotive  antifreeze  in 
the United States, Canada and Mexico. Its Prestone brand is the most widely recog-
nized  and  distributed  brand  of  antifreeze  in  North  America.  In  the  United  States, 
our Prestone antifreeze is sold in all 50 states and through virtually all major mass 
retailers,  such  as  Wal-Mart,  and  auto  retailers,  such  as  Autozone  and  Advance.  In 
addition,  we  supply  private  label  antifreeze  to  most  major  retailers  in  the  United 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

States.  We  also  supply  automakers,  such  as  General  Motors,  Ford  and  Toyota,  for 
the factory fill of their automobiles in North America. 

It may be helpful to understand the origin of antifreeze use in the automotive in-
dustry. Originally, motorists drove cars, such as the Ford Model T, without heaters 
or side and rear windows and, not surprisingly, winter driving was very unpleasant. 
Later,  with  the  development  of  car  heaters,  installation  of  side  and  rear  windows, 
and  improvements  in  engines  and  engine  lubricants,  motorists  drove  more  com-
fortably  and  frequently  in  winter  and  demand  for  engine  antifreeze  arose.  At  that 
time,  many  compounds  were  used  with  water  as  a  form  of  antifreeze,  including 
honey, sugar, molasses and, the most popular, methyl alcohol. Even methyl alcohol, 
however, had significant drawbacks including odor and flammability. Motorists were 
often uncertain about freezing protection afforded by these fluids. 

The  antifreeze/coolant  business  as  we  know  it  today  began  with  Prestone  brand 
ethylene glycol antifreeze in 1927. It was pure ethylene glycol in cans and was pack-
aged  with  charts  showing  the  protection  afforded  by  specific  dilutions.  The  fluid 
would  not  evaporate  or  burn,  was  relatively  odorless  and  offered  many  advantages 
over the substances used earlier by motorists. A few years later, Prestone developed 
and  marketed  the  first  inhibitor  in  its  antifreeze  to  offer  additional  protection  for 
the cooling system and to retard rust. In the early 1960s, Ford, General Motors and 
Chrysler  began  filling  their  new  cars  with  a  50  percent  ethylene  glycol  and  50  per-
cent water antifreeze/coolant solution, which led to the emergence of antifreeze/cool-
ant  as  a  year-round  functional  fluid  in  the  automotive  industry.  Since  then,  Pres-
tone  and  other  producers  of  antifreeze/coolant  have  developed  their  formulations  to 
provide even better corrosion protection and extend the life of a car’s cooling system. 
Ethylene glycol, which is a major ingredient of antifreeze, is toxic. For several dec-
ades,  manufacturers  of  antifreeze  have  used  foil  safety  seals  and  childproof  caps  to 
guard  against  the  accidental  ingestion  of  antifreeze.  Prestone  provides  prominent 
label warnings about proper use, storage and disposal of antifreeze. We fully comply 
with all child protection requirements established by the Consumer Products Safety 
Commission  and  we  are  dedicated  to  continual  improvement.  In  addition,  manufac-
turers  have  participated  in  public  education  and  outreach  promoting  the  safe  use 
and  storage  of  antifreeze.  During  the  past  10  years,  antifreeze  manufacturers  have 
supported  the  American  Association  of  Poison  Control  Centers  in  a  series  of  public 
service  announcements  entitled  ‘‘Take  Care:  Car  Fluids,  Children  and  Pets.’’  These 
public service announcements also help to educate consumers about proper use and 
storage of antifreeze and other automobile fluids. 

Although  it  is  rare  that  children  are  accidentally  exposed  to  antifreeze,  there  are 
occasions  where  household  pets  and  other  animals  are  exposed  to  ethylene  glycol 
products  and  are  injured  by  ingesting  the  product.  Some  animal  deaths  are  likely 
caused by intentional poisoning, such as a disgruntled person targeting a neighbor-
hood  dog  that  has  been  barking  at  night  or  causing  other  problems.  Other  animal 
fatalities  are  accidentally  caused  by  antifreeze  that  has  spilled  or  been  carelessly 
left in improperly secured containers. We and other antifreeze manufacturers spon-
sor  the  Animal  Poison  Control  Center  of  the  American  Society  for  the  Prevention 
of  Cruelty  to  Animals  as  a  resource  and  service  for  veterinarians  and  pet  owners. 
The Animal Poison Control Center is the leading animal-oriented poison control cen-
ter in North America, with a staff of specially trained veterinary toxicologists avail-
able  to  handle  any  animal  poison-related  emergency,  24  hours  a  day,  365  days  a 
year. 

For  several  years,  the  animal  rights  community  has  encouraged  local,  State  and 
Federal  lawmakers  to  pass  legislation  requiring  antifreeze  manufacturers  to  add 
denatonium  benzoate  (‘‘DB’’),  a  widely  known  bittering  agent,  to  their  product.  The 
animal rights community has argued that adding DB to antifreeze would make the 
product  taste  bitter,  discouraging  animals  from  ingesting  the  liquid.  Their  legisla-
tive efforts have met with some success, with laws passed in Oregon, California and 
New Mexico in 1991, 2002 and 2005, respectively. 

Late  last  year,  the  antifreeze  industry  reached  out  to  the  Doris  Day  Animal 
League  to  develop  consensus  Federal  legislation  that  would  address  the  safety  con-
cerns of the animal rights community. The consensus Federal legislation—S.1110—
would require the addition of DB in antifreeze with the goal of rendering the prod-
uct unpalatable and deterring children, pets and other animals from accidental poi-
soning.  This  Federal  legislation  would  create  a  national  standard.  Although  Cali-
fornia,  Oregon  and  New  Mexico  have  passed  similar  or  identical  laws,  the  legisla-
tion’s  preemption  would  avoid  the  potential  inconsistency  and  practical  difficulty  of 
manufacturers complying with what could become a patchwork of various state and 
local  mandates.  At  least  eight  other  states  have  been  actively  considering  similar 
requirements,  including  Massachusetts,  Nebraska,  Nevada,  Maine,  New  York,  New 
Jersey, Tennessee and Washington. Now is the appropriate time for Congress to es-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

tablish  a  national  standard  before  other  states  or  localities  pass  inconsistent  man-
dates. 

13

S.1110 shares many of the essential components of the state laws as well as legis-
lation introduced in the House of Representatives in 2004. The three state laws and 
H.R.  1560,  sponsored  in  the  108th  Congress  by  Rep.  Gary  Ackerman  (D–NY)  and 
Dana Rohrabacher (R–CA), all provide liability protection to antifreeze manufactur-
ers  for  DB.  The  New  Mexico  law  requires  antifreeze  manufacturers  to  specifically 
add DB as the bittering agent to their products. The laws in Oregon and California 
and  H.R.  1560,  which  was  cosponsored  by  110  House  Democrats  and  23  House  Re-
publicans  last  year,  allow  alternatives  to  DB  as  the  bittering  additive,  but  DB  is 
the only chemical that satisfies the legislations’ bitterness standard at the specified 
concentration—thereby  establishing  an  effective  mandate  requiring  manufacturers 
to  use  DB  to  fulfill  the  state  law  requirements.  H.R.  1560  was  re-introduced  by 
Reps.  Ackerman  and  Rohrabacher  this  year  as  H.R.  2567  as  the  companion  bill  to 
S. 1110 and is attracting bipartisan cosponsors. 

The  difficulty  of  managing  compliance  with  a  patchwork  of  inconsistent  state 
mandates  could  be  significant  and  may  hinder  distribution  of  an  adequate  supply 
of  antifreeze  to  some  states.  The  effects  of  state-specific  mandates  could  therefore 
be  felt  by  individual  consumers  who  may  pay  a  higher  cost  for  antifreeze  and  may 
not  be  able  to  buy  enough  for  their  needs.  A  national  standard  would  ensure  that 
the mandates are both uniform and cost effective. 

The  Federal  legislation  would  also  provide  fair  responsibility  for  the  antifreeze 
and DB products by assigning liability between the respective manufacturers. Pres-
tone  scientists  have  developed  antifreeze  products  that  we  stand  behind  and  are 
willing  to  defend.  Antifreeze  manufacturers,  however,  do  not  manufacture  or  dis-
tribute  DB.  While  antifreeze  manufacturers  are  willing  to  add  DB  in  compliance 
with  a  national  standard,  antifreeze  manufacturers  should  not  be  exposed  to  liabil-
ity  for  complying  with  that  mandate.  The  proposed  Federal  legislation  would  not 
change the liability of antifreeze manufacturers for their products. Under the legis-
lation,  antifreeze  manufacturers  continue  to  be  liable  for  the  ethylene  glycol  anti-
freeze  itself  and  DB  manufacturers  and  distributors  are  liable  for  their  bittering 
agent. 

Honeywell,  Prestone  and  the  U.S.  antifreeze  industry  appreciate  the  deliberative 
approach that Chairman George Allen and Ranking Member Mark Pryor have taken 
in  regard  to  development  of  S.  1110,  The  Engine  Coolant  and  Antifreeze  Bittering 
Agent Act of 2005. We are ready to assist the Committee as it considers the legisla-
tion, and we will be happy to answer any of the Committee’s questions.

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Bye, for your testimony. 
Now we’d like to hear from Ms. Amundson. 
STATEMENT OF SARA AMUNDSON, LEGISLATIVE DIRECTOR, 

DORIS DAY ANIMAL LEAGUE 

Ms. AMUNDSON. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman and Rank-
ing Member Pryor, for not only holding this hearing on S. 1110, but 
also demonstrating leadership on this particular issue that will ul-
timately save the lives of animals and help to prevent ingestion by 
children. 

I’m  Sara  Amundson,  Legislative  Director  for  the  Doris  Day  Ani-
mal  League.  We  have  350,000  members  nationwide  who  strongly 
support  rapid  movement  of  this  bill  into  law.  Obviously,  you’ve 
heard  from  the  panel  members  today  that  this  bill  enjoys  broad 
support  from  a  variety  of  animal-advocacy,  public-health  organiza-
tions,  and  also  the  antifreeze  industry.  We’ve  traditionally  been  at 
loggerheads,  as  Jeff  Bye  just  mentioned,  on  the  state  level  on  this 
issue, but enjoy the privilege of working with them to pass this bill 
into law. 

Obviously,  Honeywell  is  a  supporter,  the  Consumer  Specialty 
Products Association, the American Academy of Pediatrics, and the 
Pet  Food  Institute,  in  addition  to  our  organization.  Clearly,  you’ve 
heard other testimony today as to the nature of the toxic antifreeze 
that  our  pets  are  ingesting.  In  addition  to  that,  you’ve  had  a  clear 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

sense  for  why  DB,  as  the  most  aversive  bittering  agent  known  to 
humankind,  is  really  the  choice  of  chemical  to  place  in  this  par-
ticular product, so I won’t repeat that particular information. 

We have been tracking ingestions of antifreeze by pets and wild-
life,  and  what  we’ve  found  is  that,  in  one  survey,  two  out  of  three 
veterinarians see at least one ethylene glycol poisoning every single 
year. The Veterinary School at the Washington State University es-
timates the annual number of dog and cat antifreeze poisonings at 
as  many  as  10,000.  And  do  keep  in  mind,  with  those  10,000 
poisonings, the preponderance of those animals actually do die. 

Fortunately,  it’s  a  little  bit  different  situation  with  children.  Ac-
cording  to  the  statistics  compiled  by  the  American  Association  of 
Poison  Control  Centers,  approximately  1,400  children  actually  in-
gest antifreeze each year. 

These statistics are alarming, and they’re certainly enough for us 
to want to move forward in taking action on the issue. DB is clear-
ly  the  answer  for  antifreeze,  to  ensure  that,  at  pennies  per  gallon, 
we  are  doing  everything  we  can  to  use  the  tools  available  to  us  to 
ensure that children and pets are not ingesting antifreeze. 

Jeff  mentioned  a  little  bit  of  information  with  regard  to  what’s 
transpired  on  the  state  level,  and  I  do  think  it’s  important  for  us 
to  note  that  there  are  three  states  that  currently  have  this  law  in 
effect.  New  Mexico’s  bill,  sponsored  by  Representative  McCoy,  is 
exactly  the  same  language  as  we’re  seeing  on  the  Federal  level. 
They’ve really created a high threshold for us to cross. We strongly 
support the pursuit of progressive policy in the states, but, because 
of the nature of interstate commerce, and because these poisonings 
occur  regardless  of  state  lines,  we  must  pass  a  Federal  bill  to  en-
sure that the goal of reducing antifreeze poisonings is actually real-
ized.  We  must  extend  to  each  child  and  every  animal  the  extra 
layer  of  protection  that  these  states  have  so  wisely  adopted.  And 
this is only going to be accomplished in a timely, sensible, and cost-
effective manner by passing a Federal bill into law. 

A product that’s marketed on a national basis should have a na-
tional  standard  to  meet,  and  that’s  why  we,  at  the  Doris  Day  Ani-
mal  League,  feel  very  strongly  that  we’ve  got  to  have  the  Federal 
mandate on this issue. 

Please  do  keep  in  mind  that  the  absence  of  Federal  law  under-
mines  the  effectiveness  of  the  existing  state  laws.  How  do  we  pre-
vent antifreeze spills in California from cars driving in from the 47 
other  states  that  don’t  require  the  addition  of  DB  to  antifreeze? 
And  the  lack  of  uniformity,  frankly,  is  making  it  very  difficult  to 
judge just how effective some of these newer state laws are. 

Jeff  also  mentioned  that  the  U.S.  Conference  of  Mayors  passed 
a resolution. That resolution was very strongly worded. They asked 
that Congress help protect children and animals in cities by enact-
ing Federal legislation. I think that’s a very powerful testament for 
why it is that we need to move forward with this Federal bill. 

Representative  McCoy  specifically  discussed  an  incident  where 
her  own  companion  animal  ingested  antifreeze  through  an  acci-
dent.  Oftentimes,  these  are  accidents.  But  what  we’ve  found 
through  a  variety  of  case  studies  is,  antifreeze,  because  it  is  toxic, 
it’s  easily  available,  and  it’s  quite  inexpensive,  is  being  used,  in 
some  cases,  as  the  tool  of  choice  to  be  able  to  still  that  barking 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

neighbor’s  dog  that  someone  is  gravely  concerned  about  having  to 
contend  with.  One  database  recently  reported  on  cases  in  Iowa, 
Michigan,  Montana,  Mississippi,  Texas,  Florida,  Missouri,  and 
Pennsylvania as all having situations where dogs were deliberately 
poisoned through antifreeze. 

We’ve  also  been  working  with  a  family  in  Georgia  who  very  re-
cently had two dogs deliberately killed by antifreeze ingestion from 
a belligerent neighbor, and we’re attempting to assist them in seek-
ing  justice  for  these  two  lovely  faces.  These  two  dogs  were  delib-
erately killed by antifreeze ingestion. 

More than half of all American homes actually have at least one 
pet.  We  owe  it  to  these  families  to  ensure  we  provide  every  avail-
able  protection  from  antifreeze  poisonings.  Your  legislation  creates 
an  additional  tool  to  assist  in  preventing  these  tragedies.  We  re-
spectfully request your support for passing S. 1110 into law. 

And this concludes my oral testimony, but I am certainly willing 

to entertain any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Amundson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SARA AMUNDSON, LEGISLATIVE DIRECTOR, DORIS DAY 

ANIMAL LEAGUE 

Good  morning.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  for 
the  opportunity  to  testify  today  in  support  of  the  Engine  Coolant  and  Antifreeze 
Bittering  Agent  Act.  I  am  Sara  Amundson,  Legislative  Director  for  the  Doris  Day 
Animal League or (DDAL). DDAL has 350,000 members and supporters nationwide 
who strongly support S. 1110. The organization was founded in 1987 to promote the 
protection  of  animals  through  legislative  advocacy  in  the  states  and  on  the  Federal 
level.  DDAL  is  grateful  to  Chairman  Allen  and  Ranking  Member  Pryor  for  their 
leadership  on  S.  1110,  with  the  ultimate  goal  of  protecting  animals  and  children. 
This bill enjoys broad support from an unlikely coalition of animal advocacy orga-
nizations,  public  health  organizations,  and  the  antifreeze  industry.  In  addition  to 
DDAL,  these  supporters  include  the  American  Humane  Association,  the  Humane 
Society of the United States, and the Society for Animal Protective Legislation, Hon-
eywell  and  the  Consumer  Specialties  Products  Association,  the  American  Academy 
of Pediatrics, and the Pet Food Institute. 
Animals and Children are Exposed to Antifreeze 

For  the  past  fifteen  years,  the  DDAL  has  been  tracking  ingestions  of  antifreeze 
by pets and wildlife. Poisoning occurs with this product because it is often inadvert-
ently  spilled  in  our  driveways  or  left  in  open  containers  in  our  garages  by  auto-
motive ‘‘do-it-yourselfers.’’ Because it is colorful and has a sweet taste, animals and 
children  are  drawn  to  it  and  may  quickly  ingest  a  lethal  amount.  In  addition,  a 
neighbor  wishing  to  rid  himself  of  a  bothersome  barking  dog  or  wandering  cat  may 
purposefully bait a pet, instigating a cruel solution to a neighborhood squabble. One 
teaspoon  of  ethylene  glycol  antifreeze  can  kill  a  cat.  Two  tablespoons  can  kill  a 
small,  10-pound  dog.  One  survey  found  that  two  out  of  three  veterinarians  see  at 
least  one  accidental  ethylene  glycol  poisoning  each  year.  The  vet  school  at  Wash-
ington  State  University  estimates  the  annual  number  of  dog  and  cat  antifreeze 
poisonings at as many as 10,000. And unfortunately, the symptoms of poisoning can 
be misleading, causing the pet lover to think the animal is merely sleepy until renal 
failure causes death. 

According  to  statistics  compiled  by  the  American  Association  of  Poison  Control 
Centers,  as  many  as  1,400  children  ingest  antifreeze  each  year.  The  U.S.  National 
Library  of  Medicine  Toxicology  Data  Network  states  that  the  minimum  lethal  dose 
for a 150-pound male is 4 ounces, which means it takes far less to kill a child. For-
tunately, in the vast majority of cases, ingestion by children is caught early enough 
to ensure the antidote prevents lethal consequences. 

Ethylene  glycol  antifreeze  has  been  manufactured  for  decades  by  the  antifreeze 
industry and due to the ready availability of the chemical, we fully expect its contin-
ued dominance in the marketplace. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

Denatonium benzoate 

The  good  news  is  that,  unlike  many  of  the  issues  we  grapple  with,  this  one  has 
a  ready  solution.  DDAL  certainly  considers  safety  caps,  seals  and  public  education 
necessary. However, three states and several other countries have chosen to add an-
other  tool,  which  is  requiring  the  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to  antifreeze 
available in the consumer market. Denatonium benzoate (DB) is one of the bitterest 
substances  known  and  available  to  us.  In  1963,  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration 
approved the addition of DB to cosmetic and toiletry products including nail polish, 
hair  spray  and  cleaners  as  a  safety  mechanism  to  deter  children  from  ingesting 
them. The U.S. Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives (27 CFR 21.76) 
requires that all industrial alcohol-based products contain a bittering agent and spe-
cifically  requires  the  use  of  DB  in  certain  products  as  a  denaturant,  making  the 
product  unpalatable.  The  addition  of  the  bitterant  has  not  compromised  the  useful-
ness of the products. 

The  required  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to  consumer-packaged  antifreeze 
will  save  thousands  of  animal  lives  and  prevent  hundreds  of  children  from  being 
sent to emergency rooms each year. DDAL strongly urges your support of this small 
measure,  literally  costing  pennies  per  gallon,  to  achieve  significant,  beneficial  con-
sequences. 
California State Law 

The  Doris  Day  Animal  League  has  a  long  history  of  lobbying  in  support  of  state 
legislation  to  require  the  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to  make  antifreeze 
unpalatable to both animals and children. In 1993, in response to concerns from vet-
erinary  emergency  rooms,  DDAL  members  who  had  lost  a  beloved  pet,  the  death 
of a California condor, and the startling statistics on children gathered annually by 
the  American  Association  of  Poison  Control  Centers,  we  successfully  lobbied  the 
California  Legislature  to  require  the  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to  antifreeze 
and coolant products. In spite of significant opposition mounted by the manufactur-
ers  of  antifreeze,  the  bills  passed  with  overwhelming  votes  in  both  the  California 
Assembly and Senate. Unfortunately, the governor vetoed the bill. 

Then in 2000, after losing her family’s beloved dog Angus to antifreeze poisoning, 
Californian  Lauren  Ward  began  researching  the  solution  to  her  family’s  tragedy. 
She  contacted  her  state  legislators  to  demand  to  know  why  the  simple  addition  of 
DB  to  antifreeze  to  help  prevent  these  unnecessary  deaths  wasn’t  required  by  the 
state.  Fortunately,  her  assemblyman  agreed  to  introduce  a  bill  to  require  the 
bitterant be added. 

Our  research  in  support  of  the  California  bill  demonstrated  that  in  the  10  years 
that had passed, despite the voluntary efforts by the antifreeze industry to educate 
the  public,  there  was  little  progress  in  reducing  the  numbers  of  animals  and  chil-
dren  poisoned  by  ingesting  antifreeze.  In  2001,  13  California  veterinary  clinics  re-
ported  136  cases  of  antifreeze  poisoning  with  107  deaths.  Working  with  Lauren 
Ward  and  Members  of  the  California  State  Senate  and  Assembly,  we  lobbied  again 
for passage of an antifreeze bittering bill. The California Medical Association, Amer-
ican Academy of Pediatrics, California Veterinary Medical Association and the Cali-
fornia  Integrated  Waste  Management  Board  all  supported  the  legislation.  Over  the 
objections  of  the  antifreeze  industry,  the  bill  passed  and  was  signed  into  law  in 
2002. 

Subsequently,  we  have  worked  with  legislators  in  New  Mexico,  Nevada,  and  sev-
eral  other  states  to  support  bills  to  require  the  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to 
antifreeze.  This  year,  New  Mexico  became  the  third  state  to  pass  this  bill  into  law. 
And the language is identical to the Federal bill before you today. 

While  DDAL  certainly  supports  the  pursuit  of  progressive  policy  by  states,  be-
cause of the nature of commerce in this country and because these poisonings occur 
regardless  of  state  lines,  it  is  imperative  to  pass  a  Federal  bill  to  ensure  that  the 
goal  of  reducing  antifreeze  poisonings  is  realized.  It  is  important  to  extend  to  each 
child and every animal the extra layer of protection that these states have so wisely 
adopted.  This  can  be  accomplished  in  a  timely  and  sensible  manner  only  through 
Federal  action.  A  product  marketed  on  a  national  basis  should  have  a  national 
standard to meet. Moreover, the absence of a Federal law undermines the effective-
ness of existing state laws: The ease of interstate transportation necessitates a uni-
form policy to prevent antifreeze spills in California from cars driving into the state 
from  Nevada.  It  is  impossible  to  judge  the  effectiveness  of  these  new  state  laws 
based on the interstate nature of the problem. In fact, the U.S. Conference of May-
ors, at its 2004 annual meeting, passed a resolution urging Congress to ‘‘help cities 
protect  children  and  animals  by  enacting  legislation’’  to  require  the  addition  of  DB 
to antifreeze. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Conclusion 

17

Antifreeze  poisoning  causes  animals  great  suffering,  and  often  death.  In  addition 
to  the  accidents  that  happen,  DDAL  knows  of  numerous  cases  where  individuals 
have deliberately given antifreeze to animals because they wanted to kill them. One 
database recently reported on cases in Iowa (where authorities at the time were in-
vestigating  8  cases),  Michigan,  Montana,  Mississippi,  Texas,  Florida,  Missouri  and 
Pennsylvania. We have been working with a family in Georgia that is trying to get 
justice for their two dogs killed by a belligerent neighbor. And of course, Representa-
tive  McCoy,  who  successfully  carried  the  bill  in  New  Mexico,  lost  her  own  com-
panion animal in the same way. 

Where  the  perpetrator  is  known,  it  often  is  a  neighbor;  occasionally  it  is  an  ado-
lescent  just  starting  down  the  path  of  antisocial  behavior.  They  use  antifreeze  be-
cause it is easy to get, easy to give, and almost guaranteed to kill. 

Accidents  can  happen  despite  the  best  prevention  and  precautions,  and  sadly 
there are always those who seek an easy way to harm animals. This legislation will 
do much to prevent both kinds of tragedies from happening. 

Please support S. 1110, the Engine Coolant and Antifreeze Bittering Agent Act.

Senator ALLEN. Your statements will be made part of the record. 
Let  me  start  with  Representative  McCoy,  since  your  legislation 
is  the  model,  as  far  as  Senator  Pryor  and  I  are  concerned,  for  the 
Nation. Do you know if there are any environmental concerns asso-
ciated with DB? It’s important for us to understand, from your ex-
periences,  if  you’ve  heard  of  any  environmental  problems  due  to 
this additive. 

Ms.  MCCOY.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Senator,  DB  was  approved  in 
1963,  and  is  currently  used  in  all  types  of  products.  It’s  used  in 
paints,  nail  polish,  household  cleaners,  windshield-washing  fluids, 
deer repellent, and many others. I’m, too, very concerned about any 
detrimental  effects  to  the  environment.  I  happen  to  be  a  charter 
member  of  Republicans  for  Environmental  Protection,  so  I  care 
about these things. 

But  if—with  your  permission,  I  would  like  to  share  a  short  ex-
change  between  Nevada  Senator  Carlton  and  Vern  Rossi,  who  is 
Deputy Administrator of Federal Facilities and Waste Management 
Programs,  Division  of  Environmental  Protection,  Department  of 
Conservation and Natural Resources. 

Senator ALLEN. Boy, that’s a mouthful. 
Ms. MCCOY. It’s a mouthful. The title is long. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator ALLEN. That’s Federal, not Nevada, right? 
Ms. MCCOY. Yes. I believe so, yes, sir. I’m just going to read the 

Q&A, if that’s all right with you, Senator. 

‘‘Senator  CARLTON.  I  would  like  Mr.  Rossi  to  come  forward  with 

information on the environmental effects of DB. 

‘‘Mr. ROSSI. We regulate antifreeze as hazardous waste if it is not 
going  to  be  recycled.  If  it  is  to  be  recycled,  we  are  not  concerned, 
because  it  is  not  going  into  the  environment.  Adding  a  bittering 
agent  to  antifreeze  will  not  change  regulations  of  those  materials. 
The disposing or handling of antifreeze is a great concern. 

‘‘Senator  CARLTON.  There  is  some  confusion  about  the  environ-
mental  impact  of  DB.  One  group  is  saying  there  will  be  no  impact 
on  the  environment,  and  the  other  group  is  saying  there’s  a  risk. 
If  antifreeze  enters  a  water  source,  it  will  contaminate  it  imme-
diately. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

concern.’’

‘‘Mr. ROSSI. That is a concern. It does not matter if an additional 
chemical  is  added  to  antifreeze.  It  still  has  the  potential  to  pollute 
a  water  source.  Improper  disposing  of  antifreeze  is  not  acceptable. 
‘‘Senator CARLTON. Has there been any research on the long-term 

environmental effects of DB? 

‘‘Mr. ROSSI. I’ve not seen any data that causes me to believe that 

a bittering agent will add to the environmental issue. 

‘‘Senator  CARLTON.  Would  it  still  be  a  problem  with  antifreeze 

entering groundwater, whether or not DB was added? 

‘‘Mr.  ROSSI.  Yes.  The  proper  disposal  of  antifreeze  is  always  a 

So,  that—I  think  that  exchange,  coming  from  what  I  would  con-
sider  a—expert  testimony,  speaks  to  the  issue  of  environmental 
concerns. 

Thank you, Senator. 
Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you,  Representative  McCoy.  That  makes 

a great deal of sense. 

Ms.  Elder,  you  mentioned  that  DB  has  been  in  household  prod-
ucts  for,  really,  decades  now.  Is  there  any  evidence  that  DB  has 
caused  any  harm  by  being  added  to  products  like  paint  to  keep 
children from eating that, or nail polish or other products? 

Ms. ELDER. Are you speaking specifically of environmental types 

of issues? 

Senator ALLEN. Right. Environmental or any other added hazard 

or risk by having that bittering agent in a household product. 

Ms.  ELDER.  We  did  note,  in  the  study  that  we  did,  that  we 
weren’t  able  to  identify  any  instances  of  environmental  damage. 
We did note, also, that DB does not completely biodegrade and that 
the  effects  on  groundwater  were  unknown.  But  those  environ-
mental issues are probably best handled by the Environmental Pro-
tection Agency, who would have much more expertise in that area. 
Senator ALLEN. Well, you mentioned there’s no documented prob-
lems  in  the  states  that  have  required  the  addition  of  DB  to  their 
antifreeze.  Is  there  any  reason  to  suspect  that  that  would  change 
if we had Federal national legislation? 

Ms.  ELDER.  No.  The  data  that  we  have  is  limited,  and  we  just 

don’t know that. 

Senator ALLEN. All right, thank you. 
Mr. Bye, you all have changed your positions on this issue, from 
years  ago.  Let  me  ask  you  this.  It’s  good  to  know  Honeywell,  or 
Prestone,  is  in  favor  of  this  legislation.  Is  the  entire  retail  anti-
freeze industry in support of this legislation? 

Mr.  BYE.  Yes,  they  are,  in  fact.  The  domestic  producers  are  all 
in  favor  of  this,  primarily  for  the  reason  I  said,  just  from  a  pure 
logistics  and  operational  standpoint.  If  we  were  to  get  to  the  point 
where  different  states  required  different  products—either  with  a 
different  bittering  agent,  with  different  amounts  of  bittering 
agents—it would become a very, very difficult situation in the way 
that we do business. So, to that end, we are all in favor of it. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Does  Honeywell  or  Prestone  have  a  concern 
about  additional  cost  since  they  do  not  manufacture  DB.  You’re 
talking about this costing, what, pennies per gallon? 

Mr. BYE. Correct. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

Senator  ALLEN.  Could  you  give  us  the  exact  range,  so  we  know? 

What does a gallon of antifreeze cost, presently? 

Mr. BYE. There’s a long——
Senator ALLEN. Not subject to——
Mr. BYE.—answer and a short answer. 
Senator  ALLEN.—sales  taxes  and  all  the  other  things  that  get 

added on, but——

Mr.  BYE.  It  costs,  plus  or  minus,  four  to  six  dollars,  depending 
upon  the  price  of  ethylene  glycol,  which  is  a  commodity.  The  DB, 
as we use it today, because we do put it in for the states required, 
is less than three cents a gallon. 

Senator ALLEN. Three cents a gallon. 
Mr. BYE. Correct. 
Senator ALLEN. Less than. 
Mr. BYE. Yes. 
Senator ALLEN. All right. Are you concerned that the cost for this 
product will go up? Could there be a monopoly for those who manu-
facture DB? 

Mr. BYE. I don’t think so, only because—and I’ll speak, again, to 
our source from it—we buy it from a domestic source who also sup-
plies  a  number  of  those  other  inhibitors  that  I  mentioned  that  go 
into antifreeze for corrosion protection and what have you. And the 
DB that we purchase is, far and away, the smallest component that 
we  buy  from  this  company,  and  would  buy  from  the  other  compa-
nies. So, I think if there were included across the board, (a) you’re 
still  talking  about  a  very  small  amount.  It  would  still  be  consider-
ably  less  than  the  other  products  we  buy  from  them,  so  we  would 
have  that  leverage.  And  you  would  create  competition,  I  would 
think,  among  the  other  suppliers  of  DB,  because  there  are  other 
suppliers.  So,  I  think,  in  general,  we  wouldn’t  see  any  issue  with 
that. 

Senator ALLEN. Also, let me ask you this. In three states that re-
quire this DB—and New Mexico is the model state law—has there 
been any harm caused to car engines, like corrosion, due to the ad-
dition of DB to the antifreeze? 

Mr.  BYE.  No,  none  that  we’re  aware  of.  And  we’ve  tested  DB  in 
cooling  systems  to  understand  its  performance  in  a  cooling  sys-
tem—again,  not  to  its  performance  as  a  bitterant—and  that  is  an-
other  area  of  concern  for  us,  because  if  we  were  to  get  into  other 
bittering  agents  that  may  be  out  there,  they  have  not  been  tested 
for their performance in automotive cooling systems. So, we’re very 
comfortable with DB, on that front. 

Senator  ALLEN.  All  right.  So,  there  are  other  bittering  agents. 
And so, DB, at least has been tested out, proven not to be any addi-
tional  risk  to  the  environment  or  added  health  risk  to  it,  and  also 
not harming the engine—or the radiator cooling——

Mr. BYE. Our concern is harming the engines, and we see no ef-

fects of it. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Ms.  Amundson,  are  you  aware  of  any  problems 
with  respect  to  human  health  or  the  environment  related  to  DB, 
since  you  all  have  been  such  strong  advocates  for  a  long  while  on 
this? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

Ms.  AMUNDSON.  No,  we  certainly  are  not,  and  would  be  gravely 
concerned  if  there  were  issues  related  to  environmental  degrada-
tion. 

I’m going to read, if I may, into the record from a report that was 
commissioned  by  the  California  Integrated  Waste  Management 
Board in 2001, when they took a very careful look at the potential 
for  adding  DB  into  antifreeze  in  the  State  of  California.  And  they 
did, in fact, support that particular bill. 

They state, through a staff study, that DB, ‘‘readily biodegrades. 
Its  transport  is  attenuated  by  soil,  and  it  is  easily  treated  in  sew-
age-treatment  systems  and  drinking-water  systems.  Staff  has  de-
termined  that  the  addition  of  DB  to  antifreeze  would  not  lead  to 
any adverse health or environmental effects.’’

Senator ALLEN. What was that report, again, Ms. Amundson? 
Ms.  AMUNDSON.  That  is  the  2001  California  Integrated  Waste 
Management  Board,  the  entity  for  really  ascertaining  how  to  dis-
pose of waste, and that would include chemical waste. 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you. If you could provide that to the Com-

mittee, I’d like to make that report a part of the record. 

Thank you. 
[The information referred to follows:]

CALIFORNIA INTEGRATED WASTE MANAGEMENT BOARD, 

Board Meeting, July 25–26, 2001. 

AGENDA ITEM 2

Item 

Consideration  Of  Staff  Recommendations  For  Addressing  The  Impacts  Of  Anti-

freeze On Public Health And Safety In California 
I. Summary 

This  item  presents  staff’s  recommendations  to  reduce  the  impact  on  health  and 
safety  that  occurs  from  the  use  of  antifreeze  coolant  in  California.  The  most  com-
monly used antifreeze in California is formulated with ethylene glycol, which is poi-
sonous. Antifreeze products have a sweet taste and appealing color that may be at-
tractive  to  animals  and  children.  Drinking  as  little  as  one  or  two  ounces  can  lead 
to death in a small child. A cat can receive a lethal dose from licking its paws after 
walking  through  spilled  antifreeze.  Improper  storage  or  handling  of  antifreeze  con-
tributes to hundreds of human exposures in the state annually. Leaks from improp-
erly  maintained  motor  vehicles  and  improper  storage  and  disposal  leads  to  thou-
sands of animal exposures each year. In addition, this product is effective and easy 
to use for intentional poisoning of domestic animals and wildlife. 

Two  methods  are  available  to  reduce  or  eliminate  the  hazards  of  ethylene  glycol 
based  antifreeze  to  humans,  while  providing  comparable  product  performance.  One 
is to add an aversive agent to ethylene glycol antifreeze to deter ingestion. The state 
of Oregon requires the addition of the aversive agent denatonium benzoate to ethyl-
ene  glycol  based  antifreeze  sold  at  the  retail  level.  Other  countries  also  require  the 
addition  of  this  bittering  agent  to  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze.  California  legis-
lation was introduced in 1993 to require the addition of a bittering agent to ethylene 
glycol antifreeze products. The governor vetoed the bill. 

Another method to reduce poisoning from antifreeze exposures is to eliminate the 
use  of  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  and  replace  it  with  the  much  less  toxic  pro-
pylene glycol formulated antifreeze. The chemical propylene glycol is used in numer-
ous  prepared  foods  and  medicines  and  is  a  common  food  additive.  Propylene  glycol 
based  antifreeze  was  introduced  to  the  California  market  in  1994  and  is  readily 
available,  currently  constituting  about  5  percent  of  the  market.  Propylene  glycol 
based  antifreeze  provides  comparable  product  performance  as  the  ethylene  glycol 
based  antifreeze.  The  leading  antifreeze  manufacturer,  Prestone,  offers  a  propylene 
glycol based antifreeze marketed under the brand name LowTox, and Old World In-
dustries  produces  the  Sierra  brand.  Both  are  sold  throughout  the  state  at  competi-
tive prices to ethylene glycol antifreeze. At least two other countries require the re-
tail sale of propylene glycol based antifreeze as a safer substitute. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

21

Antifreeze  manufacturers  oppose  replacing  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  with 
propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  or  to  adding  an  aversive  agent  to  ethylene  glycol 
based  antifreeze.  The  requirement  of  the  child  resistant  caps  is  cited  as  having  re-
duced  poisonings.  Industry  does  support  public  education  efforts  to  prevent  expo-
sures  and  poisonings.  The  greater  chemical  industry  produced  a  video  on  safe  use, 
storage  and  disposal  of  antifreeze  several  years  ago,  and  may  develop  a  new  video 
in  the  next  few  months.  Significant  public  education  may  reduce  the  number  of  ex-
posures.  The  incidence  of  poisonings  to  children  and  adults,  domestic  animals  and 
wildlife  would  be  further  diminished  if  reformulation  or  the  addition  of  an  aversive 
agent is required. 

Staff recognize that there are significant barriers to the conversion from ethylene 
glycol to propylene glycol based antifreeze. While propylene glycol would provide the 
greatest  protection,  staff  recommend  that  the  addition  of  aversive  agents  be  re-
quired  for  all  ethylene  glycol  antifreeze  products.  No  significant  barriers  to  the  im-
mediate addition of the aversive agent, denatonium benzoate were identified. 
II. Previous Board Action 

At  the  January  2000  meeting,  the  California  Integrated  Waste  Management 
Board  (Board)  directed  staff  to  review  methods  to  significantly  reduce  the  number 
of  human  and  animal  poisonings  from  antifreeze  exposures.  Then  at  the  August 
2000  Board  meeting,  staff  presented  background  information  and  findings  from  re-
search  and  discussions  with  antifreeze  industry  representatives.  Numerous  options 
to address the antifreeze poisoning problem were presented to the Board. The Board 
directed  staff  to  continue  researching  the  highest  options  presented  for  reducing 
poisonings from antifreeze use and to return with recommended actions. 
III. Options for the Board 

Board Members may consider one or more of the following actions:

1.  Direct  staff  to  develop  a  legislative  proposal  to  phase  in  a  ban  on  the  sale 
of ethylene glycol formulated antifreeze and promote the use of propylene glycol 
formulated antifreeze or other significantly less toxic alternatives.
2.  Direct  staff  to  develop  a  legislative  proposal  to  require  the  addition  of  an 
aversive  agent,  such  as  denatonium  benzoate,  to  ethylene  glycol  based  anti-
freeze.
3.  Direct  staff  to  study  the  issues  further  and  bring  back  recommendations  for 
consideration in the future.

IV. Staff Recommendation 

Staff  recommends  that  the  Board  approve  Option  2  as  the  most  prudent  way  to 

protect human health and safety and reduce animal poisonings in California. 
V. Analysis 
Background 

The  Board  directed  staff  to  review  methods  to  significantly  reduce  the  number  of 
human and animal poisonings from antifreeze exposures at the January 2000, meet-
ing.  Staff  proceeded  to  interview  chemical  and  antifreeze  manufacturers,  recyclers, 
local  and  state  government,  automotive  manufacturers  and  service  representatives 
and veterinary and other medical professionals. A task force meeting was held Sep-
tember 28, 2000. Staff researched issues raised by all parties. The goal was to inves-
tigate  changes  that  could  be  made  to  reduce  the  effects  caused  by  ethylene  glycol 
based antifreeze exposures. 

The  antifreeze  manufacturing  industry  is  opposed  to  mandating  propylene  glycol 
based  antifreeze  to  replace  ethylene  glycol  antifreeze  or  adding  an  aversive  agent 
to  ethylene  glycol  antifreeze.  In  addition  to  child  resistant  caps,  which  has  reduced 
poisoning  incidences,  industry  advocates  public  education  as  the  most  appropriate 
mechanism  to  further  decrease  poisoning  exposures.  Industry  produced  a  public 
service  announcement  several  years  ago,  and  has  played  it  through  television  sta-
tion  and  cable  systems  throughout  the  country  including  California.  They  are  now 
planning  to  produce  a  new  California  specific  video,  which  will  replace  the  original 
video.  Industry  would  like  the  Board  to  endorse  the  video.  Staff  has  recommended 
that  the  1–800–CLEANUP  number  be  included  in  the  video;  however,  further  sup-
port and/or involvement would be at the Board’s discretion. 

Staff  produced  an  in-house  fact  sheet  on  antifreeze  about  five  years  ago.  Staff  is 
revising  the  fact  sheet  to  provide  stronger  messages  to  reduce  accidental  child  and 
pet exposures. The fact sheet will provide additional information on the safe storage 
and  use  of  antifreeze  and  a  description  of  the  safer  propylene  glycol  based  alter-
native. Staff will also work with household hazardous waste coordinators to encour-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

age them to increase promotion of the safer antifreeze (e.g., signs placed at the point 
of  purchase  indicating  that  a  product  is  an  alternative  to  a  more  hazardous  prod-
uct). 

Staff is working with the California Poison Control System (CPCS) to obtain infor-
mation  on  the  circumstances  surrounding  childrens’  exposures.  By  examining  expo-
sures,  staff  can  provide  better  outreach  to  local  government  household  hazardous 
waste  program  coordinators  and  to  residents.  In  addition,  staff  will  provide  local 
household  hazardous  waste  program  managers  information  about  the  services  pro-
vided by CPCS. 
Key Issues: 
Ethylene Glycol Toxicity and Antifreeze Exposures 

Ethylene  glycol  is  an  odorless,  sweet  tasting  poisonous  chemical  used  in  the  pro-
duction of antifreeze and many other products. Ethylene glycol can adversely affect 
humans  through  ingestion,  inhalation  or  contact  with  the  eyes  and/or  skin.  Expo-
sures  and  poisonings  from  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  are  regularly  reported 
to poison control centers. In 2000, 564 calls were made to the California Poison Con-
trol  System  hotline  regarding  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze.  Past  statistics  in 
California  have  not  been  comprehensively  available  so  a  trend  of  exposures  is  not 
available.  Nationally,  there  were  5,376  human  exposures  with  nine  deaths  in  1998 
caused by ethylene glycol antifreeze. Unintentional exposures accounted for 4,932 of 
the cases. 

According to the U.S. National Library of Medicine’s Toxicology Data Network, for 
a 150 pound adult the minimum lethal dose of ethylene glycol is 100 ml or 4 ounces, 
while propylene glycol’s minimum fatal dose level is probably over 32 ounces. There 
is  an  antidote  for  ethylene  glycol  antifreeze  poisoning  called  Antizol.  However,  an 
antidote treated patient still may have to be managed for other life threatening con-
ditions that may arise. 

A  much  lower  dose  of  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  can  kill  animals  with  as 
little as one teaspoon for a cat and two tablespoons for a 10-pound dog. Animal ex-
posures  are  more  difficult  to  quantify  because  veterinarians  are  not  required  to  re-
port these poisoning occurrences. Reported poisonings include wild and domesticated 
animals,  with  some  documented  intentional  poisonings.  Some  wild  animals  such  as 
marmots  have  been  known  to  chew  through  vehicle  coolant  hoses,  while  dogs  have 
been  known  to  chew  the  necks  of  antifreeze  containers  and  ingest  the  antifreeze. 
In 1993, a California condor, an endangered species, died from ingestion of ethylene 
glycol. 

In 1996 the American Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals conducted 
a  phone  survey  of  animal  care  professionals  and  concluded  that  118,000  domestic 
animals  were  poisoned  in  the  U.S.  by  spilled  or  discarded  antifreeze.  The  National 
Animal  Poison  Control  Center  believes  that  this  figure  is  greatly  exaggerated.  A 
more conservative estimate of animal poisoning exposures is from Washington State 
University Veterinary Medicine School with at least 10,000 dog poisonings annually. 
Diagnosis  and  treatment  of  a  pet  ingestion  of  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  can 
be  delayed  due  to  misleading  symptoms.  For  example,  a  dog  would  get  sick  after 
ingesting  antifreeze,  and  then  appear  to  improve.  Meanwhile,  renal  failure  occurs 
and it is too late to save the dog. 

Leaks  from  improperly  maintained  motor  vehicles  and  improper  storage  of  anti-
freeze as well as illegal disposal leads to thousands of animals’ exposures each year. 
A  national  survey  found  that  two  out  of  three  veterinarians  see  at  least  one  acci-
dental ethylene glycol animal poisoning each year. This would amount to over 7,000 
poisoning  exposures  in  California  alone.  This  may  be  a  conservative  estimate  be-
cause  there  certainly  are  animals  that  do  not  survive  to  return  home  and  wildlife 
that will not have a chance to receive medical treatment. (And though the California 
Poison  Control  System  hotline  is  not  for  animal  emergencies,  53  calls  were  made 
regarding pets with one death documented in 2000.) 

Appearing like common beverages, the attractiveness of antifreeze is a significant 
concern.  Antifreeze  comes  in  bright  colors,  similar  to  beverages  such  as  Kool-Aid 
and  Gatorade  that  are  recognized  by  children.  Industry  indicated  that  the  colors 
used in antifreeze products are market driven, so that service providers can quickly 
identify the types of antifreeze or other fluids they are installing. Because of world-
wide distribution, changing the color or appearance of antifreeze does not appear to 
be a reasonable undertaking at this time. 

Environmentally,  both  types  of  antifreeze  biodegrade  fairly  rapidly—in  as  few  as 
several  days  depending  upon  conditions.  (Heavy  metals  from  vehicle  engines  do, 
however, remain in the environment after the antifreeze breaks down.) 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

Option 1—Propylene Glycol Alternative 

23

Propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  is  an  alternative  to  ethylene  glycol  based  anti-
freeze, and has a significantly lower degree of toxicity to humans and animals. Used 
in  a  variety  of  consumer  products,  propylene  glycol  is  also  added  to  food  products 
and is listed by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration as either approved as a food 
additive or listed or affirmed as Generally Recognized As Safe (GRAS). Taken inter-
nally,  a  small  amount  of  propylene  glycol  is  harmless  to  humans.  Though  not  con-
sidered  GRAS  for  cats,  the  degree  of  toxicity  to  this  species  is  significantly  reduced 
compared  to  ethylene  glycol  ingestion.  There  is  no  language  on  either  Low  Tox  or 
the  Sierra  brands  of  propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  container  labels  to  indicate 
that consumers need restrict its use for any vehicle type. There is also no language 
(such  as  special  formulations  required  by  some  auto  manufacturers)  for  restrictive 
use  for  any  vehicle  type  on  the  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  product  containers 
either. Propylene glycol based antifreeze is commonly used in marine vessels as well 
as recreational vehicles throughout the country. Some auto manufacturers, however, 
do  caution  the  consumer  in  the  owner’s  manual  to  use  the  manufacturer’s  own 
brand  of  antifreeze  because  of  special  additives  and  formulations.  Though  one  auto 
manufacturer  indicated  in  the  owner’s  manual  that  it  is  necessary  to  use  their 
brand  of  antifreeze,  and  non-use  could  void  its  warranty,  the  same  manufacturer 
stated  that  it  is  rare  to  void  a  warranty  by  use  of  a  fluid.  Another  manufacturer 
does  not  promote  propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  but  has  accepted  it,  and  along 
with other automotive manufacturers state its use would not void their warranties. 
And  although  no  auto  dealership  surveyed  installed  propylene  glycol  based  anti-
freeze, some of them will, upon owner request, put it in vehicles. 

Propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  is  used  extensively  in  Austria  and  Switzerland, 
where it is the only antifreeze sold at the retail level. In France and Italy, only pro-
pylene glycol based antifreeze is sold in those stores that also sell food. 

Industry concerns not addressed above are outlined below in bold, followed by in-

formation gathered by staff in response:

1.  The  performance  capabilities  of  propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  in 
automotive vehicles are not adequate. The propylene glycol based antifreeze on 
the market currently meets the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) 
standards for cars and light duty trucks as well as for heavy-duty vehicles.

2.  There  are  no  ‘‘extended  life’’  propylene  glycol  antifreeze  formulations 
available.  Extended  life  antifreeze  has  only  been  available  for  several  years  and 
is  a  small  but  growing  segment  of  the  market.  Propylene  glycol  manufacturers  say 
the market for these formulas has not been large enough to warrant manufacturing 
such  products,  however,  a  propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  extended  life  package 
can be made.

3.  Replacing  all  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  with  propylene  glycol 
based antifreeze in California would create market problems. The California 
market for antifreeze is about 20 million gallons per year. That amount constitutes 
about  40  percent  of  the  total  propylene  glycol  produced  in  the  U.S.  annually.  A 
phased  approach  would  be  necessary  to  maintain  supply  and  market  stability  as 
well as to allow time to test and approve special formulations.

4.  A  rapid  market  swing  from  ethylene  glycol  based  to  propylene  based 
antifreeze would impact the market for recycled ethylene glycol. Auto man-
ufacturers recommend that antifreeze be changed every few years depending on ve-
hicle  use.  Because  of  the  time  between  full  market  availability  of  propylene  based 
antifreeze and the years between change-outs, the waste stream will contain signifi-
cant  amounts  of  ethylene  glycol  for  many  years.  A  ‘‘phased  in  mandate’’  approach 
would  maintain  a  stable  market  for  ethylene  glycol  as  the  proportion  of  propylene 
glycol to ethylene glycol increases in the antifreeze waste stream.

5.  Recycled  ethylene  glycol  can  not  contain  more  than  15  percent  pro-
pylene  glycol  and  meet  the  market  standard.  Currently,  the  antifreeze  waste 
stream  contains  about  5  percent  propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze.  However,  recy-
cling  propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  only  allows  1  percent  of  other  glycols  to  be 
added  to  it.  Following  a  mandate  to  reformulate  with  propylene  glycol,  the  anti-
freeze waste stream will contain increasing amounts of propylene glycol. Generators 
may  need  to  segregate  the  two  types  of  waste  antifreezes  with  separate  storage 
tanks needed for recyclers. Alternatively, recyclers would need to install systems to 
separate propylene glycol and ethylene glycol. In any case there would be significant 
cost involved.

6.  Topping  off  autos  running  on  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  with 
propylene glycol based antifreeze will lead to compatibility problems. Anti-
freeze  manufacturers  and  auto  manufacturers  are  concerned  that  mixing  two  types 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

of formulations in a vehicle may lead to reduced performance or even failure of cool-
ing systems because of possible incompatibility of additives.

7.  Propylene  glycol  costs  significantly  more  than  ethylene  glycol  and  in-
dustry profit margins are already slim. The retail cost of the two types of anti-
freeze  overlap.  Retail  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  costs  $4.00–$6.00  per  gallon 
while  propylene  glycol  based  antifreeze  costs  $4.50–$7.00  per  gallon.  Any  increase 
in  costs  would  be  passed  onto  the  consumers  resulting  in  a  level  playing  field  for 
manufacturers.
Option 2—Aversive Agent Alternative 

The  other  alternative  to  reduce  poisonings  from  the  ingestion  of  ethylene  glycol 
is to add an aversive agent. Denatonium benzoate is considered the most bitter sub-
stance  known.  From  studies  reviewed,  it  is  highly  effective  for  humans;  and  dogs 
have  exhibited  symptoms  of  grimacing,  gagging  and  even  vomiting  upon  ingestion 
of  products  containing  denatonium  benzoate.  The  taste  of  the  agent  may  not  repel 
all  animals,  but  the  American  Association  of  Poison  Control  Centers  has  rec-
ommended  that  aversive  agents  be  added  to  ethylene  glycol  products.  Aversive 
agents  are  currently  used  in  other  household  products  including  pesticides  to  deter 
ingestion.  Industry  is  concerned  that  if  an  aversive  agent  were  added  to  ethylene 
glycol  based  antifreeze,  consumers  would  be  less  vigilant  in  storing  and  managing 
the product. Staff does not necessarily agree. However, even if the number of expo-
sures does not decrease, the amount of product ingested will decrease. 

Addition of denatonium benzoate is very inexpensive, costing $0.02–$0.03 per gal-
lon  of  a  $5  per  gallon  product.  Addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to  the  approxi-
mately 20 million gallons of antifreeze used in California would cost about $500,000 
a year. This cost is relatively small compared to the $100 million dollar market and 
the  cost  would  be  passed  on  to  consumers.  This  amount  is  also  small  compared  to 
the medical costs and work time lost as well as suffering that occurs from exposures 
to this product 

Denatonium benzoate readily biodegrades, its transport is attenuated by soil, and 
it  is  easily  treated  in  sewage  treatment  systems  and  drinking  water  systems.  Staff 
has  determined  that  the  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to  antifreeze  would  not 
lead to any adverse health or environmental effects. 

The State of Oregon passed a bill in 1993 that requires the addition of a bittering 
agent in ethylene glycol antifreeze sold at the retail level. A similar bill was vetoed 
by  the  Governor  in  California  in  1993.  His  veto  message  said  denatonium  benzoate 
would  not  decrease  the  number  of  exposures  to  the  product  and  it  had  not  been 
proven effective as an animal deterrent. He also said that it was premature for the 
state  to  require  manufacturers  add  bittering  agents  to  products  before  these  sub-
stances  are  fully  evaluated  and  determined  to  be  effective.  In  response,  staff  note 
that  the  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  may  not  prevent  exposures,  but  it  would 
significantly reduce the amount ingested, hence the severity of exposures. Numerous 
studies  have  shown  that  it  does  repel  animals,  though  until  it  is  used  extensively 
in antifreeze, the magnitude of its effectiveness for animals in ethylene glycol based 
antifreeze will be difficult to verify. (Comparatively, it took 17 years to conclusively 
prove  that  child-resistant  caps  were  effective  in  reducing  child  exposures  in  gen-
eral.) 

Denatonium  benzoate  is  required  to  be  added  to  ethylene  glycol  based  antifreeze 
in  the  United  Kingdom,  Japan,  and  Australia.  There  is  also  currently  one  ethylene 
glycol  antifreeze  manufacturer  in  this  country  that  voluntarily  adds  denatonium 
benzoate  to  their  aftermarket  antifreeze  products  (5  percent  of  all  antifreeze  cur-
rently used in the United States). Lastly, Massachusetts has introduced a bill to re-
quire the addition of denatonium benzoate to all ethylene glycol based antifreeze in 
their state. 

Fiscal Impacts—N/A. 

Findings 

The  lethal  oral  dose  of  ethylene  glycol  is  a  factor  of  over  eight  smaller  than  pro-
pylene  glycol  for  humans,  making  this  a  compelling  argument  for  its  use.  And 
though wide use of propylene glycol based antifreeze could prevent a majority of un-
intentional  animal  and  human  poisonings,  mandating  a  change  at  this  time  to  pro-
pylene glycol based formulations will cause significant industry hardship. 

Addition  of  an  aversive  bittering  agent,  such  as  denatonium  benzoate,  would  re-
duce  human  poisonings  and  likely  prevent  a  significant  number  of  animal 
poisonings. The addition of denatonium benzoate is relatively inexpensive and would 
be  simple  for  industry  to  implement.  There  appear  to  be  no  compelling  reasons  not 
to  mandate  the  addition  of  denatonium  benzoate  to  all  ethylene  glycol  based  prod-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

ucts.  The  health  and  safety  of  all  residents  and  pets  and  wildlife  of  the  state  can 
benefit from this endeavor. 
VI. Funding Information—N/A.

Senator ALLEN. Senator Pryor? 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
One thing I want to do today—you all know I support the legisla-
tion, but I want to ask some hard questions, because Senator Allen 
and  I  know  that  our  colleagues  will  ask  us  these  hard  questions, 
and I’d like to get your answers on these. He’s already asked some 
of them. 

But,  Mr.  Bye,  if  I  can  start  with  you,  I  know  that  one  option  in 
framing  this  legislation  would  be  that  you  could  use  either  DB  or 
some  other  bittering  agent.  And  I  think  you  mentioned,  a  few  mo-
ments  ago,  that  other  bittering  agents  have  not  been  approved,  or 
have  not  been  tested  in  automotive—in  an  automotive  system  like 
what  you  have  with  DB.  But  are  there  other  reasons  why  we 
shouldn’t expand this to DB and other agents? 

Mr. BYE. All I can speak to—again, we are far from being experts 
in  the  world  of  bitterants.  Maybe  one  of  the  other  panelists  would 
have a deeper point of view on this, but we’ve really just been try-
ing to work with them in the bitterants that they feel are the most 
effective and most—strongest bittering agent there is, as you point-
ed  out  earlier.  So,  that’s  really  all  we’ve  done,  is  follow  their  lead 
that  that  is  the  one  to  use,  and,  therefore,  that  is  the  one  we’ve 
tested,  because  we  produce  it,  in  a  cooling  system.  But,  beyond 
that,  we  haven’t  really  looked  at  any  other  bittering  agents,  just 
been doing what they’ve been asking us to do. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK,  great.  Let  me  followup  on  another  one  of 
Senator  Allen’s  questions.  A  few  moments  ago  he  asked  about  DB 
and  other  sources  of  it.  And,  just  to  be  clear,  as  I  understand  it, 
DB  is  not  proprietary.  In  other  words,  it’s  out  there  in  the  public 
domain. Is that your understanding? 
Mr. BYE. That’s my understanding. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  there  either  are  now,  or  could  be,  multiple 

sources for DB. 

Mr. BYE. I know of at least three today. 
Senator PRYOR. That exist today? OK, great. 
Ms. Amundson, let me ask you a question. And it’s just a concern 
that  some  people  might  have  that  if  you  add  this  bittering  agent, 
somehow  maybe  the  industry  or  the  word  might  get  out  that  sud-
denly  antifreeze  is  safe—so-called  ‘‘safe’’—and  people  might  get 
complacent about the storage of it or the disposal of it. Do you have 
any comments on that? 

Ms.  AMUNDSON.  I  greatly  appreciate  the  question.  It’s  certainly 
the  position  of  the  Doris  Day  Animal  League  that  we  bear  a  re-
sponsibility  to  consumers  to  provide  the  information  that’s  nec-
essary  to  them  to  take  a  careful  look  at  this  issue.  And,  in  doing 
so,  we  have  never  positioned  ourselves  as  supporting  the  addition 
of DB to antifreeze as the panacea to the problem. 

That  said,  I  think  we  need  to  be  careful  when  we’re  assessing 
these sorts of mandates, or even enforcing these sorts of mandates, 
on the regulated industries. Let’s keep in mind the simple fact that 
seatbelts  certainly  save  lives,  but  they  don’t  save  every  life.  And, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

unfortunately,  childproof  safety  caps  have  been  very  successful  in 
saving  children’s  lives,  but,  if  improperly  used,  clearly  there  may 
still be some difficulties there. 

Our  position  has  been,  we  need  to  use  all  the  tools  available  to 
us—and  that  is  foil  seals,  childproof  safety  caps,  the  addition  of 
DB,  and  good,  solid  public  education—to  ensure  that  people  still 
recognize that ethylene glycol antifreeze is a toxic chemical. 

Senator PRYOR. OK, great. 
Let  me  ask,  too,  we  mentioned—Senator  Allen  mentioned  these 
two different reports. There’s one in 1992 from the Consumer Prod-
ucts  Safety  Commission,  and  there’s  also  one  in  2001  from  Cali-
fornia.  I’d  just  like  to  ask  the  panel  generally—all  of  you  all  can 
answer  this,  if  you  want—what  is  the  difference  in  those  reports? 
It seems to me that, if you look at them, the 2001 report is a much 
better,  much  stronger  report  for  the  position  that  DB  is  OK  and 
this actually is a good idea. Can I—whoever——

Yes? 
Ms.  MCCOY.  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator,  I  guess  I  would  just  sim-
plify it by stating that antifreeze has to be properly disposed of, al-
ready.  If  it’s—even  with  the  bittering  agent,  it’s—which  is,  I  be-
lieve,  30-to-one-million  parts,  it’s  a  very  minute  amount,  so—I’m 
not  diminishing  the  fact  that  there  could  be  some  environmental 
issue, but I personally did a lot of research, and had our legislature 
look for me, and no one could find anything definitive about it. 

So,  given  the  fact  that  it  has  to  be  properly  disposed  of  without 
the bittering agent, I think that that’s the answer. So—Thank you, 
Senator. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Anybody  else  want  to  comment  on  the  two 

reports? 

Ms. AMUNDSON. If I may, thank you. 
I  will  say  that  my  comprehension  of  the  CPSC’s  report  is  that 
they  were  asked  to  take  a  very  careful,  narrow  look  at  a  couple  of 
different potentials for bittering agents, and the conclusions in that 
report  clearly  stated  that  their  recommendation  was  that  DB  be 
added to some consumer products, and antifreeze was one of them. 
While  there  may  be  information  that  is  not  necessarily  collated  in 
that report, I think the reflection of the 2001 report from the Cali-
fornia Integrated Waste Management Board provides us with more 
comprehensive  information  on  some  of  the  questions  that  you’re 
raising  today,  and  that  is  because  it  is  their  job  to  take  a  careful 
look at what environmental consequences are going to be. And they 
were taking a look at this issue specifically by raising the question, 
What can we do with antifreeze to try to ensure that kids and ani-
mals  are  not  ingesting  it?  And  their  conclusion  clearly  was  to  sup-
port the California bill. 

Senator  PRYOR.  As  part  of  these  studies,  have  they  studied 
whether, when you add DB, actually you see child deaths go down? 
Has  anyone  done  that  detail  of  study?  Do  you  know?  My  sense  is, 
that may be beyond the scope of any study that’s been done. 

Ms.  AMUNDSON.  Senator,  I  would  say  it’s  probably  beyond  the 
scope  of  existing  studies.  But  I  think  it’s  a  careful  point  that  we 
need  to  make  here,  and  that  is,  fortunately  there  are  not  a  lot  of 
children  who  do  actually  die  from  ingesting  antifreeze.  It  is  much 
more on the animal side. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

27

Senator  PRYOR.  And  I  know—as  I  understand  it,  DB  has  been 
used  in  antifreeze  for  some  time  in  the  United  Kingdom,  Japan, 
and  Australia.  Do  we  know—do  we  have  studies  from  those  coun-
tries?  And  do  we  have  data  and  information  from  those  countries? 
Does anybody know? 

[No response.] 
Senator PRYOR. I’m not aware of any. I think our staff was look-

ing for some, but I’m not aware of any. 

Senator ALLEN. Mr. Bye, do you all sell—excuse me. 
Senator PRYOR. Go ahead. 
Senator  ALLEN.  Do  you  all  sell  in  these  countries?  Japan?  Aus-

today. 

tralia has a lot of animals. 

Mr.  BYE.  We  sell  almost  no  antifreeze  outside  of  the  United 
States.  We  sell  mostly  to  retail,  and  outside  of  the  United  States 
it’s  not  a  big  retail  market,  so  we  sell  less  than  1  percent  of  our 
sales outside the United States. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. And, Mr. Bye, let me ask you, I’ve heard the 
figure ‘‘30 parts per million.’’ What is that, about a drop per gallon? 
Mr.  BYE.  It’s  a  minuscule  amount.  I’m  not  a  chemist,  but  it’s  a 
tiny  amount,  and—but  that  tiny  amount  is  highly  effective,  as  one 
who tasted bitterant the other day in a minuscule amount. And you 
don’t ever want to do that again. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator PRYOR. Let me ask you——
Mr. BYE. I just wanted to be prepared. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator PRYOR. Yeah, great. You didn’t bring any for us to drink 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. BYE. Be careful. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me  ask  you,  Mr.  Bye,  while  we  have  you 
here,  part  of  your  company’s  support  for  this  legislation  is  some—
there’s  a  provision  that  you  will  not  be  held  liable  under  the  law. 
Could  you  explain  your  company’s  rationale,  what  you  accomplish 
by that? 

Mr.  BYE.  Sure.  It’s,  I  think,  pretty  straightforward.  We  are, 
again,  experts  at  the  product  we  make,  prior  to  bitterant,  and  the 
inhibitors and chemicals therein, in the antifreeze, and their effect 
and  what  they’re  designed  to  do  in  a  car’s  cooling  system.  And,  to 
that end, we’re more than happy, and always have taken full—and 
assumed full responsibility for any liability of those products. 

But  we  are  not  experts,  and  have  had  no  reason  to  be  experts 
in  the  world  of  bitterants,  much  like  any  other  chemical.  In  this 
case,  no  pun  intended,  we  become  the  ‘‘vehicle’’  for  delivering  that 
and  what  it  does,  but  we’ve  never  had  a  reason  to  understand  its 
properties, in any great detail. 

And so, for that end, I think just to make this whole thing work 
we  would  be  happy  to  assume  liability  for  our  end  of  the  product 
line,  and  hope  that  the  people  that  provide  that—because  it  is  not 
part of a car’s cooling system—would assume liability for their end 
and achieve what these people are looking for. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

Senator PRYOR. OK. Would your company, or would the industry, 
be comfortable with a sunset on that liability provision in 10 or 15 
years, or not? 

Mr.  BYE.  To  be  honest  with  you,  we  haven’t  talked  about  that, 
because  we’ve  always  assumed  that  it  would  be  something  that 
would be separated from us. We could get back to you on that and 
look at that, but we have no position on that, currently. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  And,  also  in  terms  of  the  industry,  you 
maybe heard my question a few moments ago about—maybe the in-
dustry,  or  at  least  maybe  the  public  perceiving—if  the  industry 
doesn’t  market  it  this  way—but  the  public  perceiving  that  some-
how—by  adding  this  chemical,  that  suddenly  antifreeze  becomes 
‘‘safe.’’  Do  you—has  the  industry  thought  about  that,  and  thought 
about  how  they  market  it  in  such  a  way  that  the  public  will  not 
be  misled  and  will  understand  this  is  still  a  very  dangerous  prod-
uct,  just  that  it  is—you’ve  added  a  safety  feature  to  it?  What’s 
your—how are you going to handle that? 

Mr. BYE. Sure. I would take the same position we’ve taken right 
along.  And,  as  I  mentioned  in  my  earlier  testimony,  we’ve  been 
supporters  of  the  veterinary  poison  hotlines,  and  they  would  not 
want  us  to  promote  the  fact  that  there  is  bitterant  in  the  product, 
because  it  could  lead  to,  sort  of,  a  lax’d  attitude,  in  their  opinion. 
And  we  would  fully  support  that.  We  would  have  no  intentions  of 
promoting the fact that their product was bittered. We would have 
no  intentions  of  marketing  it  as  a  ‘‘safer’’  product.  We  would  be 
doing  it  just  for  the  case,  as  stated,  that  accidental  spillages  came 
in  contact  with  an  animal,  and  hope  to  deter  them.  But  we 
wouldn’t make any more point of it than that. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  my  last  question—and  maybe,  Mr.  Bye, 
you’re  the  best,  but  whoever  wants  to  try  to  answer  this—is  DB, 
itself,  a  toxin?  Is  it,  in  and  of  itself,  poisonous  or  harmful  to  hu-
mans, do we know? 

Mr. BYE. I don’t know. 
Ms.  MCCOY.  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator,  I  just  read  something  re-
cently,  that  a  diluted  form  of  DB  is  actually  used  as  a  deterrent 
for thumb-sucking, so, it’s—I don’t think it is toxic. So——

Senator  PRYOR.  Does  anybody  else  have  any  comments  on  that? 
Ms.  ELDER.  Our  data  shows  that—at  the  levels  that  would  be 
used  for  an  aversive  or  bittering  agent,  that  it  would  not  have 
acute toxicity. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. Thank you for your time. 
Thank you. 
Senator  ALLEN.  Through?  Well,  all  right.  Well,  thank  you,  Sen-

ator Pryor, for those questions. 

And I want to thank all of our witnesses for appearing today. 
From this hearing—the value of hearings is to adduce testimony 
and information and evidence that bolster or possibly modify legis-
lation.  It  strikes  me  that  what  we  have  here  is  a  consensus—con-
sensus  that  adding  DB  to  antifreeze  would  cost  less  than  three 
cents  a  gallon—since  I’m  very  frugal  and  always  look  at  what  the 
cost  of  things  are.  But  for  less  than  three  cents  a  gallon,  it  is  not 
going  to  eliminate  risk,  but  it  is  going  to  reduce  risk.  That’s  a  key 
thing  from  Senator  Pryor’s  questions.  And  some  of  the  testimony 
here  is,  you  can  add  a  bitterant  to  antifreeze,  but  it  doesn’t  mean 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

that  you  don’t  have  to  have  the  same  cautions,  as  far  as  caps  and 
warnings,  and,  obviously,  also  disposal.  Representative  McCoy’s 
logic was just plain old common sense, you’re still going to have to 
dispose of itssafely. It doesn’t matter whether there’s a bitterant or 
not  in  it.  And  by  reducing  this  risk,  we  clearly  are  going  to  lessen 
and  prevent  harm  somewhat  to  humans.  But  the  greatest  risk  is 
to  animals.  The  references  to  pets—people  pay  attention  to  when 
their dog or cat’s gone, but there are also a lot of other animals out 
there.  There’s  birds,  fox,  deer,  other—that  might  lap  some  of  that 
up  in  a  driveway  or  somewhere  else,  and  those  don’t  get,  nec-
essarily, reported. 

The  added  point  is,  for  less  than  three  cents  a  gallon,  reducing 
risk  and  harm  to  animals  and  humans,  there’s  also  no  evidence 
that this will cause any environmental harm. 

Its  seems  to  me,  Senator  Pryor,  that  we  need  to  be  moving  on 
this.  We’ve  heard  some  very  reasoned,  logical  analysis  here  today. 
Thank  you  all,  all  of  our  witnesses,  for  coming  from  all  across  the 
country  and  sharing  your  insight  and  also  your  passion,  your  pas-
sion  for  this.  And  we  want  to  thank  our  friends  from  the  Land  of 
Enchantment for showing us the way here in Washington, D.C. 

Ms. MCCOY. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator  ALLEN.  With  that,  I  wish  you  all  safe  travels  home. 

Hearing adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 10:55 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:59 May 08, 2006 Jkt 027356 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27356.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

